CIK: 856982
Company Name: MERIT MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2018-03-01
Accession Number: 0000856982-18-000007


Item 1 Business. The Company Merit Medical Systems, Inc. is a leading manufacturer and marketer of proprietary disposable medical devices used in interventional, diagnostic and therapeutic procedures, particularly in cardiology, radiology, oncology, critical care and endoscopy. We strive to be the most customer focused company in healthcare. Each day we are determined to make a difference by understanding our customers needs and innovating and delivering a diverse range of products that improve the lives of people and communities throughout the world. We believe that long term value is created for our customers, employees, shareholders, and communities when we focus outward and are determined to deliver an exceptional customer experience. Merit Medical Systems, Inc. was founded in 1987 by Fred P. Lampropoulos, Kent W. Stanger, Darla Gill and William Padilla. Initially we focused our operations on injection and insert molding of plastics and electronic and sensor based technologies. Our first product was a specialized control syringe used to inject contrast solution into a patient's arteries for a diagnostic cardiac procedure called an angiogram. Since that time, our sales and product lines have expanded substantially, both through internal research and development projects and through strategic acquisitions. Our business strategy focuses on four target areas as follows enhancing growth and profitability through research and development, sales model optimization, cost discipline, and operational focus; optimizing our operational capability through lean processes, cost effective environments and asset utilization; targeting high growth, high return opportunities by understanding, innovating, and delivering in our core product groups; and maintaining a highly disciplined, customer focused enterprise guided by strong core values to globally address unmet or underserved healthcare needs. We conduct our operations through a number of domestic and foreign subsidiaries. Our principal offices are located at 1600 West Merit Parkway, South Jordan, Utah, 84095, and our teleph1 number is (801) 253 1600. See Item 2 Properties. We maintain an Internet website at www.merit.com. Products We design, develop, market, and manufacture, through our own operations and contract manufacturers, approximately 190 innovative medical products that offer a high level of quality, value and safety to our customers, as well as the patients they serve. Our products are used in the following clinical areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. During the year ended December 31, 2017, net sales generated by our top ten selling products accounted for approximately 37% of our total net sales. Sales of our inflation devices (including our Big60 device sold within our endoscopy segment and kits and packs which include inflation devices, but also include other products) accounted for approximately 114%, 127% and 14.0% of our net sales for the years ended December 31, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively. The success of our products is enhanced by the extensive experience of our management team in the healthcare industry, our experienced direct sales force and distributors, our ability to provide custom procedural solutions such as kits, trays and 3 Table of Contents procedural packs at the request of our customers, and our dedication to offering facility unique solutions in the markets we serve worldwide. We offer products focused in five core product groups peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology and spine, cardiovascular and critical care, and endoscopy. A number of our products are marketed within multiple product groups; accordingly, we do not maintain separate measures of profitability by product group. Based on industry data and our internal market information, we estimate that the addressable market opportunities (in terms of annual net sales), that we are targeting with our current or newly released product portfolios, for each of our core product groups are as follows Peripheral Intervention $23 billion (global) Cardiac Intervention $18 billion (global) Cardiovascular and Critical Care $34 billion (global) Interventional Oncology and Spine $14 billion (global) Endoscopy $496 million (U.S. domestic) However, we operate in a competitive environment with many companies seeking to address the same market opportunities. Additionally, these opportunities may evolve significantly as a result of changes in customer preferences or the macroeconomic and regulatory environments in which we operate. For these and other reasons, we cannot guarantee the degree to which we will be able to realize increased net sales as a result of these, or any other, opportunities. We currently conduct our business through 2 financial reporting segments cardiovascular (which includes our peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology and spine and cardiovascular and critical care product groups) and endoscopy. For information relating to our business segments, see Note 12 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. Peripheral Intervention We strive to provide our customers, the healthcare providers, with superior products designed to alleviate patient suffering from peripheral vascular and non vascular diseases. These technologies support the minimally invasive diagnosis and treatment of diseases in peripheral vessels and organs throughout the body excluding the heart. Our peripheral intervention product line is organized into product portfolios as follows Access, Angiography, Intervention and Drainage & Biopsy products. Peripheral Access Portfolio We offer a broad line of devices used to gain and maintain vascular access. These products include access systems such as the micropuncture family kits consisting of the MAK (mini access kit), the S MAK (stiff MAK) and the PAK (pedal access kit). Additionally, our extensive line of Prelude sheath introducers and related products provide clinicians with smooth, convenient, and less traumatic access to the patient's vasculature. The Prelude Short Sheath provides vascular access to dialysis grafts, along with our extensive line of micro access devices as previously described. We also offer a wide range of guide wires, diagnostic catheters, therapeutic infusion systems and safety products that can be used during dialysis related procedures. We have continued our strategic partnership with Bluegrass Vascular Technologies, and have continued the global distribution rights with respect to the Surfacer Inside Out Access Catheter System. The Surfacer system, which received CE mark approval, is an innovative Inside Out approach to restore access to the right internal jugular vein and to preserve treatment options in hemodialysis patients with occluded veins. Additionally, we believe the Surfacer system aligns with our existing peripheral access portfolio. In 2017, we continued our focus on the HeRO (Hemodialysis Reliable Outflow) Graft, a fully subcutaneous vascular access system, intended for use in maintaining long term vascular access for chronic hemodialysis patients who have failing fistulas, grafts or are catheter dependent due to a central venous blockage. The Super HeRO Adapter and its accompanying HeRO Ally Revision Kit are the newest addition to our growing HeRO family of dialysis devices. This technology offers surgeons the safety and efficiency of the original HeRO graft, but with more graft options to choose from, including early cannulation grafts, which can eliminate the need for a bridging catheter. The CentrosFLO Long Term Hemodialysis Catheters anchor our chronic dialysis line. With its self centering distal tip design, the CentrosFLO is designed to maintain long term patency, as shown by retrospective and prospective studies published in 2016. We also offer the ProGuide Chronic Dialysis Catheter, a workhorse catheter for chronic dialysis. 4 Table of Contents We offer perit1al dialysis catheters, accessories and implantation kits as part of our dialysis access product line, including the Flex Neck and ExxTended Perit1al Dialysis Catheters. Additionally, we have expanded our perit1al dialysis portfolio to include an implantation system for an over the wire catheter placement technique familiar to interventionists. Peripheral Angiography Portfolio The diagnosis and treatment of peripheral arterial disease ("PAD") is paramount to ensuring appropriate patient care and helping patients achieve an enduring productive lifestyle. We offer an extensive portfolio of diagnostic and interventional products for the diagnosis and treatment of PAD and work closely with the physicians to develop new products to aid in the treatment of this disease. We market a portfolio of hydrophilic and diagnostic guide wires for use in angiographic and interventional procedures in both the radiology and cardiology arena. Diagnostic guide wires are used to traverse the vascular anatomy and aid in placing catheters and other therapeutic devices to their target location. The Merit Laureate Hydrophilic Guide Wire has a consistent, lubricious coating intended to promote advancement through the vasculature, provide support for crossing difficult lesions, and facilitate smooth catheter exchanges by minimizing friction. Our pre coated InQwire Diagnostic Guide Wires are lubricious and available in a wide range of configurations designed to assist physicians when navigating the peripheral vasculature and placement of devices. In 2017, we added the high performance InQwire Amplatz guide wires to our product line, providing our customers with a more supportive guide wire portfolio that aids in stability within the vasculature for enhanced navigation and device delivery through the most difficult anatomy. Catheters play an important role in the diagnosis of peripheral disease. They carry contrast media which allows the blood vessels and any anomalies to be visualized in the imaging process. Our Performa and Impress Diagnostic Catheter products are designed to provide solutions for traversing difficult peripheral vasculature during diagnostic procedures. These catheters work in tandem with our guide wires to aid in the diagnosis of peripheral artery disease and can be used to facilitate transradial access, a procedure which uses the wrist artery as the access entry point for peripheral procedures rather than the more traditional femoral artery approach. Peripheral Intervention Portfolio We market an extensive line of products designed to treat blood clots that obstruct the flow of blood in arteries and veins. Our therapeutic thrombolytic infusion systems include the Fountain Infusion System and the Mistique Infusion Catheter. These catheters are used to treat thrombus, or blood clots, in the peripheral vessels of the body, as well as native dialysis fistula and synthetic grafts. We offer standard and low profile ASAP Aspiration Catheters, which offer clinicians 2 options for the safe and efficient removal of fresh, soft emboli and thrombi from vessels. For crossing tight, difficult lesions, we market our line of Merit SureCross Support Catheters. Our SureCross catheters offer trackability, pushability and visibility utilized by physicians to cross partial and total chronic occlusions in the peripheral arteries. Our vascular retrieval devices are single use products designed for foreign body manipulation and retrieval and can be used to retrieve inferior vena cava filters, reposition indwelling venous catheters, strip fibrin sheath formation, and assist in recanalization of both arterial and venous chronic occlusions. We enhanced our EN Snare Endovascular Snare System with a new robust delivery catheter and peel away insertion tool, which simplifies the snare deployment process and increase reliability during use. For more than 2 decades, we have offered inflation devices designed to accurately measure pressures during balloon and stent deployment. We offer the basixTOUCH Inflation Device for 1 handed preparation and priming for faster preparation time. Many procedures today require high pressures. For these procedures, we offer the basixTOUCH40 Inflation Device. Its 40 ATM (standard atmosphere) pressure capacity allows inflation of high pressure interventional balloons. Additionally, the BasixCompak Inflation Device and the Blue Diamond Digital Inflation Device feature an angled gauge for better viewing. We expanded our Advocate Peripheral Angioplasty Balloon product line in 2017 with the launch of our 0.035 platform. The Advocate Peripheral Angioplasty Balloon products are intended for balloon dilation or percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of the iliac, femoral, popliteal, infra popliteal and renal arteries. 5 Table of Contents Peripheral Drainage & Biopsy Portfolio We have a broad line of drainage access products. Our 1 Step Drainage Catheter, Safety Paracentesis Procedure Tray and Thoracentesis and Paracentesis Set are designed to provide clinicians with safe, convenient and cost effective methods for removing unwanted fluid accumulation. Our Valved 1 Step Centesis Catheters are designed with an integrated self sealing valve to minimize the risk of air entering the pleural space and to prevent fluid leakage during thoracentesis and paracentesis procedures. The ReSolve Locking Drainage Catheter offers a convenient locking mechanism that we believe enhances patient comfort. A range of catheter fixation devices are also available including the StayFIX Fixation Device and the Revolution Catheter Securement Device, which were designed to save time, enhance patient comfort and improve cost effectiveness. We provide a wide selection of accessories that complement our drainage catheters, including tubing sets and drainage bags. For non vascular applications, the mini access kit (MAK NV ) is designed for easy visualization and quick access into the drainage area. For enhanced visibility, the kit features an echo enhanced needle and radiopaque marker tip on the introducer. In January 2017, we launched the CorVocet Biopsy System for soft tissue biopsy procedures. This exciting new product is designed to cut a full core of tissue, providing large specimens for pathological examination. Its sleek lines, light weight, and ergonomic grip help facilitate 1 handed priming, positioning, and deployment, which is especially beneficial during image guided procedures. Additionally, the CorVocet is the first full core biopsy needle with a customizable throw length for precision clinician control. In August 2017, we acquired proprietary b1 and spine biopsy products from Laurane Medical S.A.S. ("Laurane"), headquartered in Sonchamp, France. We are selling these biopsy products exclusively to the existing customer base until we have transferred all of the manufacturing processes to our Irish manufacturing facility. We anticipate a full launch of the Laurane b1 and spine biopsy products in the second quarter of 2018. Cardiac Intervention We manufacture and sell a variety of products designed to aid in the treatment of various cardiac conditions specific to interventional cardiology and electrophysiology including cardiac rhythm management and lead management. 2 key program drivers in cardiac intervention during 2017 were the Think Radial Program and Think Interventional CRT , which stands for cardiac resynchronization therapy. Think Radial is a global education program that provides clinicians with the training and tools to commence or further their practice of the transradial approach. The transradial approach uses the artery in the wrist as the entry point for either cardiac catheterization or peripheral procedures, rather than the more traditional femoral artery in the groin. In 2017, we hosted several Think Radial training courses at our facilities for interventional cardiologists and interventional radiologists from across the U.S., Europe and Canada. The Think Interventional CRT therapy training program showcases a new interventional approach to implanting left ventricle leads. This approach utilizes new products and offers techniques to electrophysiologists who are relatively new to telescoping support catheters, subclavian vein venoplasty, and using snares to provide guidewire support. In 2017, our Think Interventional CRT training programs globally assisted with the training and education of electrophysiologists from across the U.S., Europe and Canada. Our cardiac intervention product group is organized under product portfolios which include Access, Angiography, Hemostasis, Intervention, and Electrophysiology. Cardiac Access Portfolio We offer a broad line of devices used to gain and maintain vascular access for cardiology procedures, including needles, scalpels, arm boards and sheath introducers. Our line of Prelude Sheath Introducers is designed to provide clinicians with quick and convenient access to the patient's vasculature. The PreludeEASE Hydrophilic Sheath Introducer is our anchor product for radial access, designed to provide access to the radial artery while minimizing the potential for spasm with a hydrophilic coating that extends to the tip of the sheath. To provide a more complete offering for radial access procedures, we offer the Rad Board family of products. The Rad Board is designed to provide radiation protection to physicians, provide a larger work space for physicians and an area for patients to rest their arms during radial procedures. 6 Table of Contents Cardiac Angiography Portfolio For angiography procedures, we market an array of diagnostic catheters including the Performa line. We believe that these catheters offer physicians superior torque, high shaft strength for pushability and a large inner diameter for improved flow rates during a variety of angiographic procedures. Our MIV Radial Ventriculogram Pigtail Catheter addresses the difficulty in accessing the left ventricle from the radial artery, which occurs when using standard femoral approach catheters. Cardiac Hemostasis Portfolio Catheterization for diagnostic and interventional cardiology procedures generally takes 1 of 2 approaches, femoral or radial. We offer products to assist clinicians in obtaining and maintaining hemostasis following arterial catheterization by either approach. For hemostasis of the femoral artery, we offer the Safeguard Pressure Assisted Device and for hemostasis of the radial artery, we now offer the PreludeSYNC TM hemostasis device, as well as our legacy Safeguard Radial TM device. These devices compete in a fast growing segment within the interventional cardiology and radial compression markets. The PreludeSYNC was designed to address the market need for improved patient comfort and clinician use without compromising safety. To accomplish this, the device has a soft band with a secure hook and loop closure. To improve patient experience, the device comes packaged with creative, unique designs printed directly on the band, which is a first of its kind for our company. Additionally, we have recently provided the option to customize the bands for healthcare facilities. This can be with their logo or specific messaging, providing a personalized experience. We have developed a broad line of clinically acclaimed hemostasis valves, MAP Merit Angioplasty Packs and angioplasty accessories. Hemostasis valves connect to catheters and allow passage of additional guide wires, balloon catheters and other devices into the vasculature, while reducing the amount of blood loss during the procedures. Our hemostasis valve line includes the Honor , PhD , AccessPLUS , Access 9 , DoublePlay , MBA and the Passage . Cardiac Intervention Portfolio For more than 2 decades, we have offered an extensive line of inflation devices designed to accurately measure pressures during balloon and stent deployment. The basixTOUCH Inflation Syringe reduces preparation time through its single handed preparation and priming features. The Blue Diamond Digital Inflation Device features an angled gauge for better viewing. Additionally, our IntelliSystem and Monarch Inflation Devices, as well as the BasixCOMPAK Inflation Syringe, offer clinicians a wide range of features and prices. During coronary catheterization procedures, guiding catheters are used to gain access to the heart. Our line of Concierge Guiding Catheters has an advanced braiding technology and proprietary polymer blend shaft, which allow for an increased lumen size while maintaining exceptional support. Pericardiocentesis is a procedure through which fluid is aspirated from the pericardial sac (the sac enveloping the heart). Our pericardiocentesis kit is designed as an organized, ready to use, convenient tray to assist the clinician in draining fluid quickly from the pericardial sac. For angiography and angioplasty procedures we offer the Ostial PRO Stent Positioning System, a medical grade disposable guide wire system designed to provide consistent and precise stent implantation in aorto ostial lesions during coronary or peripheral interventional procedures. Additional angiographic accessories include the Flow Control Switch , an integrated, 1 handed, single channel switch designed with clinician and patient safety in mind. Electrophysiology Portfolio We offer innovative solutions to address lead implantation and therapeutic delivery in the rapidly expanding cardiac rhythm management and electrophysiology markets. Cardiac rhythm management ( CRM ) is the field of cardiac disease therapy that relates to the diagnosis and treatment of cardiac arrhythmias or the improper beating of the heart with pacemakers and implantable cardioverter defibrillators. Our CRM products include the Classic Sheath , Prelude SNAP , and Prelude SNAP Hydrophilic families of splittable hemostatic sheaths designed for the insertion of cardiac leads for pacemakers and implantable cardioverter defibrillators. We also offer the Worley Advanced LV Delivery System to aid in the insertion and implantation of left ventricular pacing leads, through the coronary sinus to the left lateral wall of the heart for heart failure patients. The Worley Advanced LV Delivery System has been shown to reduce lead implant failures, improve target lead location and reduce procedure times. 7 Table of Contents Electrophysiology is the study of diagnosing and treating abnormal electrical activities of the heart. Common electrophysiology procedures include diagnostic electrophysiology studies and therapeutic ablation procedures designed to treat arrhythmias. We offer the HeartSpan Transseptal Needle, which is designed with a larger ergonomic handle, unique unibody needle design and optimal needle sharpness; the HeartSpan Transseptal Sheath, which features an improved hemostasis valve for reduced blood loss and air embolism, smooth sheath to dilator transition for easier transseptal crossing, and reinforced stainless steel tubing for excellent torque response. In 2017 we updated this product line with new lengths and shapes to match market demands. Additionally, we launched a second generation HeartSpan Steerable Sheath Introducer responding to user feedback with a variety of key features, most notably a neutral position indicator to help physicians with orientation. Cardiovascular and Critical Care Every year thousands of critical care patients experience Catheter Related Blood Stream Infections ("CRBSI"). CRBSI is 1 of the most frequent, costly, and mortal complications of central venous catheterization. In February 2017, we acquired the assets of Catheter Connections, Inc. to enhance our existing clinical safety product portfolio by providing a novel disinfectant cap, the DualCap Disinfection and Protection System to minimize the potential of catheter associated infections. To complement the acquisition of Catheter Connections, we also acquired critical care assets from Argon Medical Devices, Inc. ("Argon") to create a broad business line of products and solutions for cardiac and critical care patients. Combined with a robust pipeline of product development projects, we believe the cardiovascular and critical care business is positi1d to provide innovative solutions to meet the needs of critical care patients and clinicians for years to come. Infection Prevention & Safety Medical errors are cited as the third leading cause of death in the USA, with approximately 250,000 preventable deaths occurring annually. Color coded Medallion Syringes along with the Pen and Label (PAL ) Medication Labeling System comply with patient safety initiatives from the Joint Commission to reduce medication delivery errors. Contaminated fluids and needle stick injuries may spread infectious diseases to clinical workers and providers. Our ShortStop Temporary Sharps Holders protect clinicians from accidental needlesticks while our family of BackStop Disposable Basins meet the Occupational Safety & Health Administration (OSHA) guidelines for contaminated fluids and waste. The recent acquisition of the DualCap augments our foundation of safety products to further prevent contamination and infection of invasive vascular lines. Unlike other cleaning alternatives in the marketplace, the DualCap prevents alcohol from entering the blood stream of male luer connections while reducing the time required to disinfect needleless connectors. Hemodynamic Monitoring Blood pressure monitoring assists in determining proper patient treatment. We have an extensive portfolio of fluid management and monitoring devices, including the Meritrans Disposable Pressure Transducer and the TRAM Manifolds with Integral Transducers. The acquisition of certain critical care products from Argon expanded our patient monitoring portfolio by providing the Safedraw Closed Arterial Blood Sampling Kits, thermodilution catheters, and DTXPlus Disposable Pressure Transducers. The acquisition further bolstered our kits, packs, and procedure tray business by adding the Careflow Central Venous Catheters, Arterial Catheters, and Introducer Sheaths. Interventional Oncology and Spine In June 2017, we received 513(f)(2) (de novo) classification from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") to expand indication for our Embosphere Microspheres. The indication now includes prostatic artery embolization ( PAE ) for symptomatic benign prostatic hyperplasia. Embosphere is the first embolic agent to receive FDA clearance for prostatic artery embolization, providing a non surgical treatment option for millions of men who suffer from benign prostatic hyperplasia. Benign prostatic hyperplasia is an enlarged prostatic gland and can cause lower urinary tract symptoms in men. The PAE procedure is performed through an incision in the patient upper thigh or wrist, and may use Embosphere Microspheres to occlude the prostatic arteries, reducing their blood supply and causing the prostate to shrink and improve symptoms. In July 2017, we acquired the assets of Osseon LLC ("Osseon"). The Osseon product line, Osseoflex , compliments and rounds out our portfolio for the treatment of vertebral compression fractures ("VCF"). The Osseoflex products include access kits, steerable needles, steerable and straight balloons, b1 cement, as well as cement mixing and delivery systems. Osseon steerable products fit well with our unique brand of directional devices that allow users to navigate and target specific spine anatomy. 8 Table of Contents Vertebral Compression Fractures Portfolio VCFs occur when a vertebra cracks, fractures or collapses due to osteoporosis or cancer. VCFs can be extremely painful and have debilitating effects on a patient quality of life. Using our StabiliT System, physicians treat VCFs by inserting small instruments through the skin into the fractured vertebra. B1 cement is injected through a hollow needle into the fractured b1 Our StabiliT System is a comprehensive treatment system and includes access instruments, osteotomes, introducers, b1 cement and corresponding mixing and delivery systems. Ablation Portfolio We offer our STAR Tumor Ablation System to cancer patients for the palliative treatment of painful metastatic tumors. Targeted radiofrequency ablation using the STAR System offers patients pain relief and improved quality of life in a minimally invasive treatment. This procedure requires an articulating radiofrequency, or RF, device to be placed through the skin into the vertebral body and inserted directly into the tumor to ablate the tumor. Thermocouples embedded in the RF device allow for constant monitoring of the temperature directly in the ablation z1, which is a key feature when performing ablations near vital structures like the spinal cord. The STAR system includes ablation instruments, introducers, osteotomes and our MetaSTAR RF Generator. Inflation Syringes Our digital inflation devices, the IntelliSystem , Monarch and Blue Diamond are used in discography, a technique used to determine whether a disc is the source of pain in patients with back or neck pain. Oncology Portfolio In the United States, we sell QuadraSphere Microspheres for the treatment of hypervascularized tumors, including hepatoma, and arteriovenous malformations. Malignant hepatoma, also known as hepatocellular carcinoma, is a common cancer and the third leading cause of cancer deaths worldwide. QuadraSphere Microspheres are precisely calibrated and designed to offer controlled, targeted embolization, treating hepatocellular carcinoma by reducing or stopping the blood flow to the tumors. In Europe, as well as Brazil, Russia, and in many other markets, excluding the U.S., we offer HepaSphere Microspheres for delivery of chemotherapy drugs in the treatment of primary and metastatic liver cancer. Embolotherapy Portfolio We offer Embosphere Microspheres to treat hypervascularized tumors, including symptomatic uterine fibroids, embolization of the prostatic arteries for the treatment of symptomatic benign prostatic hyperplasia, and arteriovenous malformations in the United States as well as Europe and other international markets. Additionally, in certain markets outside of the U.S., we offer Embosphere Microspheres for hemostatic embolization. We also offer polyvinyl alcohol particles, Bearing nsPVA , globally for the treatment of hypervascularized tumors, including symptomatic uterine fibroids and vascular malformations. Delivery Systems Portfolio We manufacture a variety of microcatheters for the controlled and selective infusion of diagnostic, embolic, or therapeutic agents into vessels. The SwiftNINJA steerable microcatheter articulates up to 180 degrees in opposing directions. This articulating feature allows physicians to treat diseases that in the past would have been too difficult to access due to challenging patient anatomies. We continue to offer our Merit Maestro Microcatheter, which has a swan neck design that allows physicians to "seat" the catheter in the vessel. The SwiftNINJA and Maestro can be used for the controlled and selective infusion of diagnostic, embolic, or therapeutic materials into vessels. They are compatible with many key configurations of Embosphere, Quadrasphere, HepaSphere, Bearing nsPVA, and other competitive embolic products. In 2017, we introduced the True Form Reshapable Guide Wire which was designed with the ability to be shaped and reshaped multiple times for vessel cannulation. True Form stainless steel core provides excellent support, its hydrophilic coating increases trackability through vessels, the flexible shaft easily navigates tortuous anatomy, and its shapeable tip retains shape during procedures. In August 2017, we began offering the Merit Maestro Microcatheter and True Form Reshapable Guide Wire packaged together to make it more convenient for customers to order their microcatheters and guide wires. 9 Table of Contents Endoscopy Our endoscopy division, Merit Endotek, integrates advanced non vascular stent technology with balloon dilators, inflation devices, guide wires, procedure kits, and other devices that are used by endoscopists in interventional gastroenterology, interventional pulmonology, and thoracic and general surgery. Merit Endotek has a dedicated marketing and sales organization serving these growing markets. Merit Endotek sells a variety of non vascular stents, including AERO and AERO DV Fully Covered Tracheobronchial Stents. These covered, self expanding nitinol stents are used by interventional pulmonologists and thoracic surgeons to treat strictures and fistulae in the airways, and to offer palliation to patients suffering from strictures caused by cancer. The AEROmini fully covered bronchial stent was launched in 2015 and features a low profile delivery system designed to provide additional flexibility, and aid in the accurate placement of stents in difficult airway anatomy. Merit Endotek's esophageal stents, the Alimaxx ES and the EndoMAXX fully covered esophageal stents, are used by interventional gastroenterologists, otolaryngologists and thoracic surgeons to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors and strictures affecting the esophagus, as well as to treat concomitant tracheoesophageal fistulae. Merit Endotek's biliary stent systems are marketed under the Alimaxx B brand name. Alimaxx B stent systems are used by interventional gastroenterologists to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors affecting the bile duct. Merit Endotek's esophageal balloon dilator, the Elation Fixed Wire Balloon Dilator, was introduced late in 2015, and is intended for use in adult and adolescent populations to endoscopically dilate strictures of the esophagus. In 2016, we added a wire guided balloon dilator, intended for use in the alimentary tract, to the Elation product line, and in 2017, the Elation Pulmonary Balloon Dilator was introduced to the market. All of these devices can be paired with Merit Endotek's BIG60 inflation device. Merit Endotek's BIG60 Inflation Device is a 60 mL syringe and gauge designed to inflate and deflate non vascular balloon dilators while monitoring and displaying inflation pressures up to 12 atmospheres. Merit Endotek also offers Endotek labeled versions of the BasixCOMPAK and Monarch Inflation Device to customers in pulmonology, gastroenterology, and thoracic surgery. For non vascular procedures, we market the MAXXWIRE guide wire, our line of specialty guide wires that have pulmonology and gastroenterology applications. For endoscopy and bronchoscopy procedures, we offer a variety of kits and accessories, including the AEROSIZER tracheobronchial stent sizing device, the Brighton Bipolar Probe, the BiliQUICK Cholangiography Rapid Refill Continuous Injection Kit, the TIO 3 in 1 combination oral airway, bite block and oxygen administration device, the Vaclok Negative Pressure Syringe, and the convenient BAL (bronchoalveolar lavage) Convenience Kit . In 2017, Endotek introduced the TWISTER PLUS rotatable retrieval device for use in both gastroenterology and interventional pulmonology. Specialty Procedure Products We provide coating services for medical tubes and wires under original equipment manufacturer ( OEM ) brands. We offer coated tubes and wires to customers on a spool or as further manufactured comp1nts like hypotubes, guide wire comp1nts, coated mandrels stylets and coated needles. We operate a hypotube manufacturing facility in Galway, Ireland, which provides advanced laser cutting and ablation, passivation, cleaning and other hypotube manufacturing processes. Our Merit Hypotube TM is used as the catheter shaft in percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty and percutaneous transluminal angioplasty balloon catheters, as well as functional guide wires. Customers and clinicians often have unique needs when performing procedures. We have a long history of manufacturing and selling syringes, stopcocks, high pressure tubing, safety solutions, and many more products used across the clinical care continuum. We work closely with customers to create standard and customized trays, packs, and kits to enable clinicians to more effectively perform clinical procedures. In October 2017, we acquired ITL Healthcare Pty. Ltd. ("ITL"), a custom procedure pack business located in Melbourne, Australia. The facility we acquired from ITL includes sterilization capabilities. Our sensor division manufactures and sells microelectromechanical systems sensor comp1nts consisting of piezoresistive pressure sensors in various forms, including bare silicon die, die mounted on ceramic substrates, and fully calibrated comp1nts for numerous applications both inside and outside the healthcare industry. 10 Table of Contents Marketing and Sales Target Market Industry. Our principal target markets are peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology, critical care and endoscopy. Within these markets our products are used in the following clinical areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. According to U.S. government statistics, cardiovascular disease continues to be a leading cause of death and a significant health problem in the United States. Treatment options range from dietary changes to surgery, depending on the nature of the specific disease or disorder. Endovascular techniques, including angioplasty, stenting and endoluminal stent grafts, continue to represent important therapeutic options for the treatment of vascular disease. We derive a large percentage of our revenues from sales of products used during percutaneous diagnostic and interventional procedures such as angiography, angioplasty and stent placement, and we intend to pursue additional sales growth by building on our existing market position in both catheter technology and accessory products. In addition to products used in the treatment of coronary and peripheral vascular disease and in electrophysiology, we continue our efforts to develop and distribute other devices used in our target markets. For example, we have developed and are distributing products used for percutaneous drainage. Prior to the widespread use of computed tomography or ultrasound imaging, surgery was necessary to drain internal fluid from body cavities and organs. Currently, percutaneous drainage is frequently prescribed as the treatment of choice for many types of fluid collections. Our family of drainage catheters and associated devices are used by physicians in interventional radiology, vascular surgery and cardiology catheter lab procedures. Marketing Strategy. As part of our product sales and marketing efforts, we attend major medical conventions throughout the world pertaining to our target markets and invest in market development including physician training, peer to peer education, and patient outreach. We work closely with major healthcare facilities and key opinion leader physicians involving our primary target markets in the areas of training, therapy awareness programs, clinical studies and ongoing research. We also offer products to service the dialysis access market. These products are used in renal replacement therapies, including the treatment of acute renal failure, chronic renal failure and end stage renal disease. Our hemodialysis access products include catheters and kits for interventional radiologists and interventional nephrologists. Our family of perit1al dialysis products is designed to support specific implantation techniques for interventional radiologists, interventional nephrologists and laparoscopic surgeons. We also offer a variety of products for dialysis access interventions for these customers. We believe the development of Merit Endotek and the move into the areas of interventional gastroenterology, pulmonology and thoracic surgery will open new opportunities to sell our existing products, such as inflation devices, syringes, centesis catheters and procedure kits to those markets, but will also provide opportunities to market additional products incorporating our non vascular stent, balloon dilator and guide wire technologies. In general, our target markets are characterized by rapid change resulting from technological advances and scientific discoveries. We plan to continue to develop and launch innovative products to support clinical trends and to address the increasing demands of these markets. Product Development Strategy . Our product development is focused on identifying and introducing a regular flow of profitable products that meet customer needs. To stay abreast of customer needs, we frequently seek suggestions from health care professionals working in the fields of medicine in which we offer or are developing products. Suggestions for new products and product improvements may also come from engineers, marketing, sales people, physicians and technicians who perform clinical procedures. When we believe that a product suggestion demonstrates a sustainable competitive advantage, meets customer needs, fits strategically and technologically with our business and has a good potential financial return, we generally assemble a project team comprised of individuals from our sales, marketing, engineering, manufacturing, legal, and quality assurance departments. This team works to identify the customer requirements, integrate the design, compile necessary documentation and testing, and prepare the product for market introduction. We believe that 1 of our marketing strengths is our capacity to conceive, design, develop and introduce new products. U.S. and International Sales. Sales of our products in the U.S. accounted for approximately 58%, 61% and 61% of our net sales for the years ended December 31, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively. In the U.S., we have a dedicated, direct sales 11 Table of Contents organization primarily focused on selling to end user physicians, hospitals and clinics, major buying groups and integrated healthcare ne2rks. Internationally, we employ sales representatives and contract with independent dealer organizations and custom procedure tray manufacturers to distribute our products worldwide, including territories in Europe, Africa, the Middle East, Asia, South and Central America, Oceania, and Canada. In 2017, our international sales grew approximately 32% over our 2016 international sales, and accounted for approximately 42% of our net sales. China represents our most significant international sales market with net sales of approximately $734 million , $59.9 million , and $50.7 million for the years ended December 31, 2017 , 2016 and 2015 , respectively. With the recent and planned additions to our product lines, we believe our international sales will continue to increase. Our largest non U.S. market is China, which represented approximately 10% of our net sales in 2017. We maintain a distribution center and administrative office in Beijing. We also have small sales offices in Shanghai, Guangzhou, and Hong Kong. We sell our products through more than 400 distributors in mainland China, who are responsible for reselling the products, primarily to hospitals. We employ sales personnel throughout China who work with our distributors to promote the clinical advantages of our products to clinicians and other decision makers at hospitals. Under this modified direct sales approach, our salespeople are involved with promoting the advantages of our products to clinicians and other customers, while the distributors handle sales transactions and address issues related to fulfillment and inventory management. In Europe, the Middle East, and Africa, we have both corporate (i.e., direct) and modified corporate sales operations. Our corporate sales operations are active throughout Europe, including the largest markets of the UK, France, Germany, and Sweden. Our direct sales personnel are principally engaged in each of our product groups. Marketing teams responsible for each product group operate clinical education programs, often directed by leading subject matter personnel, who provide technical instruction on techniques and therapies to physicians, nurses, and technologists. We are currently conducting education programs specific to radial access, spinal intervention, surgical grafts, and electrophysiology. We require our international dealers to store products and sell directly to customers within defined sales territories. Each of our products must be approved for sale under the laws of the country in which it is sold. International dealers are responsible for compliance with applicable anti bribery laws, such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, as well as all applicable laws and regulations in their respective countries. In 2016, we began conversions from distributor based sales models to direct sales models in Australia and Canada. We now supply hundreds of healthcare providers directly in Australia and Canada from Merit operated distribution centers in those countries. In May 2017, we terminated our distribution agreement with Sheen Man Co., Ltd. and Sugan Co, Ltd., (collectively "Sugan"), a Japanese medical device distributor, and acquired the customer list Sugan used in the distribution of many of our products in Japan. In connection with our acquisition of the critical care division of Argon, we have implemented a modified direct sales approach (similar to the approach we are pursuing in China) to market and sell the majority of our products in Japan. Our goal with conversion is to obtain improved product pricing and more direct access to the end users of our products within these sales channels. We consider training to be a critical factor in the success of our sales force. Members of our sales force are trained by our clinical marketers, our staff professionals, consulting physicians, and senior field trainers in their respective territories. OEM Sales. Our global OEM division sells comp1nts and finished devices, including molded comp1nts, sub assembled goods, custom kits and bulk non sterile goods, to medical device manufacturers. These products may be combined with other comp1nts and products from other companies and sold under a Merit or third party label. Products sold by our OEM division can be customized and enhanced to customer specifications, including packaging, labeling and a variety of physical modifications. Our OEM division serves customers with a staff of regional sales representatives based in the U.S., Europe and Asia, and a dedicated OEM Engineering and Customer Service Group. Customers We provide products to hospitals and clinic based physicians, technicians and nurses. Hospitals and acute care facilities in the United States generally purchase our products through our direct sales force, distributors, OEM partners, or custom procedure tray manufacturers who assemble and combine our products in custom kits and packs. Outside the United States, hospitals and acute care facilities generally purchase our products through our direct sales force, or, in the absence of a sales force, through independent distributors or OEM partners. 12 Table of Contents In 2017, our U.S. sales force made sales accounting for approximately 42% of our net sales directly to U.S. hospitals and sales accounting for approximately six percent of our net sales through other channels, such as U.S. custom procedure tray manufacturers and distributors. We also sell products to other medical device companies through our U.S. OEM sales force, which accounted for approximately 10% of our 2017 net sales. The remaining 42% of our 2017 net sales was attributable to sales made to international markets by our direct sales force, international distributors, and our OEM sales force. Sales to our largest customer accounted for approximately 2 percent of net sales during the year ended December 31, 2017. Research and Development Our research and development operations have been central to our historical growth, and we believe they will be critical to our continued growth. In 2017, our commitment to innovation led to the introduction of several new products, improvements to our existing products and expansion of our product lines, as well as enhancements and new equipment in our research and development facilities. Our research and development expenses were approximately $514 million , $45.2 million , and $40.8 million in 2017 , 2016 , and 2015 , respectively. We continue to develop new products and make improvements to our existing products utilizing many different sources. Our Chief Executive Officer and Executive Vice President of Global Research & Development, work closely with our sales and marketing teams to incorporate feedback from physicians and clinicians in the field, which can lead to innovative new products and improvements to our existing products. Currently we have research and development facilities in Dallas, Texas Galway, Ireland Jackson Township, New Jersey Malvern, Pennsylvania Paris, France Pearland, Texas San Jose, California Singapore South Jordan, Utah Tijuana, Mexico Venlo, The Netherlands West Jordan, Utah Manufacturing We manufacture many of our products utilizing our proprietary technology and our expertise in plastic injection and insert molding. We generally contract with third parties for the tooling of our molds, but we design and own most of our molds. We utilize our experience in injection and insert molding technologies in the manufacture of most of the custom comp1nts used in our products. We have received International Standards Organization ( ISO ) 134852003 certification for our facilities in Utah, Texas, Virginia, Pennsylvania, The Netherlands, Ireland, France, Singapore and Mexico. We have also received ISO 90012008 certification for our coatings facility in Venlo, The Netherlands and our Merit Sensor Systems, Inc. ( Merit Sensors ) facility in South Jordan, Utah. Merit Sensors develops and markets silicon pressure sensors and presently supplies a substantial portion of the sensors we utilize in our digital inflation devices and blood pressure sensors. Given the specialization of our manufacturing personnel and processes in our Utah and Ireland facilities, we possess the capability to strategically shift the manufacture of more technologically advanced products to those facilities, and utilize the manufacturing capacity of our other facilities for more commoditized products. The actual determination of manufacturing location will be based upon multiple factors, including technological capabilities, market demand, acquisition and integration activities and economic and competitive conditions. We currently produce and package all of our embolic products. Manufacturing of our embolic products includes the synthesis and processing of raw materials and third party manufactured compounds. 13 Table of Contents We have packaging and manufacturing facilities located in Chester, Virginia; Galway, Ireland; Joinville, Brazil; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Melbourne, Australia; Paris, France; Pearland, Texas; Singapore; South Jordan and West Jordan, Utah; Tijuana, Mexico; and Venlo, The Netherlands. See Item 2 Properties. We have distribution centers located in Auckland, New Zealand; Bangalore, India; Beijing and Hong Kong, China; Chester, Virginia; Joinville, Brazil; Maastricht, The Netherlands; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Melbourne, Australia; Toronto, Canada; Podolsk, Russia; Seoul, South Korea; South Jordan, Utah; Tijuana, Mexico; and Tokyo, Japan. We believe that our variety of suppliers for raw materials and comp1nts necessary for the manufacture of our products, as well as our long term relationships with such suppliers, promote stability in our manufacturing processes. Historically, we have not been materially affected by interruptions with such suppliers; however, we are experiencing a growing trend from suppliers of polymer resins to refuse to supply resin to medical device manufacturers or require that we assume additional risks due to the potential for product liability claims. There can be no assurance that we will not experience supply disruptions in the future. We seek to develop and have relationships with potential back up suppliers for materials and comp1nts in the event of supply interruptions. Competition The medical products industry is highly competitive. Many of our competitors are much larger than us and have access to greater resources. We also compete with smaller companies that sell single or limited numbers of products in specific product lines or geographies. We compete globally in several market areas, including diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. The principal competitive factors in the markets in which our products are sold are quality, price, value, device features, customer service, breadth of line, and customer relationships. We believe our products have achieved market acceptance primarily due to the quality of materials and workmanship of our products, clinical outcomes, their innovative design, our willingness to customize our products to fit customer needs, and our prompt attention to customer requests. Our products are priced competitively, but generally not below prices for competing products. Some of our primary competitive strengths are our relative stability in the marketplace; a comprehensive, broad line of ancillary products; and our history of introducing a variety of new products and product line extensions to the market on a regular basis. In the interventional cardiology and the radiology markets as well as the gastroenterology, endoscopy, general surgery, thoracic surgery and pulmonology markets, we compete with large international, multi divisional medical supply companies such as Cordis Corporation (Cardinal Health); Boston Scientific Corporation; Medtronic; Abbott; Teleflex; Becton, Dickinson and Company (including the operations previously conducted by C.R. Bard) ("BD"); Cook Incorporated; Stryker Corporation ("Stryker"); 3M; ICU Medical and Terumo Corporation. Medium size companies we compete with include B. Braun; Uresil; BTG; Olympus Medical; Edwards Lifesciences; Argon; CONMED; AngioDynamics; Medcomp and U.S. Endoscopy. Based on available industry data, with respect to the number of procedures performed, we believe we are a leading provider of digital inflation technology in the world. In addition, we believe we are 1 of the market leaders in the United States for analog inflation devices. We believe we are a market leader in the United States for control syringes, waste disposal systems, tubing and manifolds. We anticipate the recent and planned additions to our product lines will help us compete even more effectively in both the U.S. and international markets. There is no assurance that we will be able to maintain our existing competitive advantages or compete successfully in the future. We derive a substantial majority of our revenues from sales of products used in diagnostic angiography, interventional cardiology and radiology procedures. We believe medical professionals are starting to use new interventional methods, procedures and devices, as well as drugs, for the treatment and prevention of cardiovascular disease. These new methods, procedures, devices and drugs may render some of our products obsolete or limit the markets for our products. However, with the advent of vascular stents and other procedures, we have experienced continued growth in sales of our products. In the vertebral augmentation market, our main competitors are Medtronic and Stryker. Both Medtronic and Stryker offer products to treat vertebral compression fractures (including the CareFusion products Stryker acquired from BD, but only Medtronic offers products to treat metastatic spine tumors. Within the field of uterine fibroid embolization ("UFE") and PAE, we believe we are a market share leader. Based on both research and clinical studies conducted on our product for UFE and PAE, we believe we offer physicians consistent and 14 Table of Contents predictable product performance, ease of use, targeted delivery, and durable vessel occlusion, and therefore satisfactory short and long term clinical outcomes validated by peer reviewed publications, when compared to our competitors. Our primary embolotherapy product has been Embosphere Microspheres. Currently, the primary products with which our microspheres and embolic particles compete are Beadblock and DC Bead , sold by BTG plc; Embozene and Contour sold by Boston Scientific, Inc; PVA Foam Embolization Particles, sold by Cook Medical; HydroPearl , sold by Terumo International Systems ("Terumo"); and Gelfoam , sold by Pfizer Inc. Our principal competitors in UFE are BTG plc, Boston Scientific and Terumo, as well as companies selling or developing non embolotherapy solutions to treat uterine fibroids. Proprietary Rights and Litigation We rely on a combination of patents, trade secrets, trademarks, copyrights and confidentiality agreements to protect our intellectual property. We have a number of U.S. and foreign issued patents and pending patent applications, including patents and rights to patent applications acquired through strategic transactions, which relate to various aspects of our products and technology. The duration of our patents is determined by the laws of the country of issuance and, for the U.S., is typically 20 years from the date of filing of the patent. As of December 31, 2017, we owned or had a license to more than 1,000 U.S. and international patents and patent applications. Additionally, we hold exclusive and non exclusive licenses to a variety of third party technologies covered by patents and patent applications. In the aggregate, our intellectual property assets are critical to our business, but no single patent, trademark or other intellectual property asset is of material importance to our business. The Merit name and logo are trademarks in the U.S. and other countries. In addition to the Merit name and logo, we have used, registered or applied for registration of other specific trademarks and service marks to help distinguish our products, technologies and services from those of our competitors in the U.S. and foreign countries. See Products above. The duration of our trademark registrations varies from country to country; in the U.S. we generally can maintain our trademark rights and renew any trademark registrations for as long as the trademarks are in use. As of December 31, 2017, we owned over 300 U.S. and foreign trademark registrations and trademark applications. There is substantial litigation regarding patents and other intellectual property rights in the medical device industry. At any given time, we may be involved as either a plaintiff or a defendant, as well as a counter claimant or counter defendant, in patent, trademark, and other intellectual property infringement actions. If a court rules against us in any intellectual property litigation we could be subject to significant liabilities, be forced to seek licenses from third parties, or be prevented from marketing certain products. In addition, intellectual property litigation is costly and may consume significant time of employees and management. Regulation U.S. Regulation. The Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) and other federal, state and local authorities regulate our products and product related activities. Under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ) and accompanying regulations, the FDA regulates the design, development, clinical trials, testing, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, distribution and promotion of medical devices. We believe our products and procedures are in material compliance with all applicable FDA regulations, but the regulations are subject to change. We cannot predict the effect, if any, that these changes may have on our business. In addition, if we experience regulatory problems with a product or manufacturer, we could become subject to fines, delays or suspensions of regulatory clearances, seizures or recalls of products, operating restrictions, and criminal prosecution. Such actions could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on certain of our marketing and promotional practices. We are in the process of responding to the subpoena, which we anticipate will continue during 2018. The investigation is ongoing and at this time we are unable to predict its scope, duration or outcome. Investigations such as this may result in the imposition of, among other things, significant damages, injunctions, fines or civil or criminal claims or penalties against our company or individuals. Overview of the FDA Regulation of Devices. The FDCA establishes a risk based classification system for medical devices and applies regulatory controls commensurate with the risk posed by a device Class I devices are those for which safety and effectiveness can be reasonably assured by adherence to the FDA general regulatory controls, which include compliance with the applicable portions of the FDA Quality System Regulations (QSRs), facility registration and product listing, reporting of certain adverse medical events and malfunctions, and compliance with the FDA restrictions against misbranding and adulteration. While most Class I devices are exempt 15 Table of Contents from the 510(k) premarket notification process (assuming they are within the limitations of the exemption), some Class I devices also require 510(k) clearance by the FDA. Class II devices are subject to the FDA general controls, including the design control requirements of the QSRs, and any other special controls deemed necessary by the FDA to provide reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of the device. While most Class II devices require premarket review and clearance by the FDA through the 510(k) premarket notification procedure, some Class II devices are exempt from the 510(k) premarket notification process (assuming they are within the limitations of the exemption). Class III devices are those deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or those devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device. Class III devices include those devices for which the FDA has determined that general and special controls al1 are insufficient to assure the safety and effectiveness of the device. FDA Premarket Review. In general, we cannot introduce a new medical device into the market until we obtain market clearance through a 510(k) premarket notification or approval through a premarket approval ( PMA ) application. Some devices, typically lower risk devices, are subject to specific exemptions from premarket review. In addition, in limited cases, devices may come to the market through alternative procedures, such as a de novo classification request or humanitarian device exemption. To obtain 510(k) clearance, a device manufacturer must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to another legally marketed predicate device. A predicate device is a device that has been cleared through the 510(k) process; a device that was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976; a device that has been down classified by the FDA to Class I or Class II; or a device that the FDA has previously determined to be exempt from the 510(k) process. To be substantially equivalent, the notification must show that the new device has the same intended use and the same technology as the predicate device, or, if the new device has different technology, that the device is as safe and effective as the predicate device and does not raise different questions of safety and effectiveness. Performance testing is generally required to demonstrate substantial equivalence, and, for some devices, clinical data may be required. The standards and data requirements necessary for the clearance of a new device may be unclear or may be subject to change. In addition, the FDA may publish or adopt special controls it deems necessary to provide a reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of a device, which might include standards for the testing and clearance of a new device. The 510(k) clearance procedure usually takes between 3 months and 1 year from the date a 510(k) notification is submitted, but it may take longer. The FDA may find that substantial equivalence has not been shown and, as a result, require additional clinical or non clinical testing to support a 510(k) or require the submission of a de novo classification request or PMA application for the device. A de novo classification is an alternate pathway to classify novel devices that are low to moderate risk but for which no substantially equivalent predicate device exists. Clearance of a de novo request generally takes six months to 1 year from the time of submission of the de novo request, although it can take longer. A PMA application is required for Class III devices. The application must demonstrate that there is reasonable assurance that the device is safe and effective for its intended use based on valid scientific evidence. The PMA application process can be expensive, generally takes several years to complete and typically includes, among other things, human clinical trials, manufacturing facility inspection, bench tests and laboratory and animal studies, which can be costly to conduct. There is also a substantial user fee that must be paid to the FDA in connection with the submission of each PMA application. The FDA may determine that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, which could significantly delay the introduction of new devices. If the FDA approves the PMA application, it may place restrictions on the device. If the FDA's evaluation of the PMA application is not favorable, the FDA may deny approval of the PMA application or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also require additional testing or clinical trials prior to approval or as a condition of approval. If human clinical trials of a medical device are required for FDA clearance or approval and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial must file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with the FDA prior to commencing human clinical trials in the USA. Submission of an IDE application does not ensure that the FDA will issue the IDE. If the IDE application is approved, there can be no assurance the FDA will determine that the data derived from the trials support the safety and effectiveness of the device or warrant the continuation of clinical trials. An IDE supplement must be approved by the FDA before a sponsor or investigator may make a change to the investigational plan in such a way that may affect its scientific soundness, study indication or the rights, safety or welfare of human subjects. For clinical trials involving a device that does not present a significant risk, the sponsor is not required to obtain approval of an IDE, but the sponsor must obtain the review and approval of an institutional review board. Both significant risk and non significant risk trials are subject to additional FDA regulations, including a requirement to obtain informed consent and reporting and recordkeeping requirements. We, the FDA, or the institutional review 16 Table of Contents board, may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such clearances or approvals, the loss of previously received clearances or approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, if the FDA discovers that an applicant has submitted false or misleading information, the FDA may refuse to review submissions until certain requirements are met pursuant to its Application Integrity Policy, which specifies procedures that the FDA personnel should follow to ensure the integrity of data and information in applications submitted for FDA review and approval. We are currently conducting a clinical trial to obtain PMA approval from the FDA to claim the use of the QuadraSphere Microspheres with doxorubicin for the treatment of liver cancer in the United States. In order for us to obtain FDA approval to promote the use of QuadraSphere Microspheres for the purposes indicated in our clinical trial, we will need to complete the trial and submit positive clinical data to the FDA. If we cannot enroll study subjects in sufficient numbers to complete the necessary studies, if there is a disruption in the supply of materials for the trials or depending on other factors, we will likely not be able to complete the trial. Even if we complete the clinical trial, the FDA may require us to undertake additional testing, or the trial results may not be sufficient to obtain FDA approval for other reasons, including inconclusive or negative results of our trials or those conducted by our competitors or other third parties. If we do not obtain FDA approval of the product use claimed in a clinical trial, we will not be able to promote the subject product for the indicated treatment of the specific disease or condition in the United States. A clinical study involving the use of our EndoMAXX EVT Valved Esophageal Stent to relieve dysphagia in patients with malignant stricture of the esophagus was completed. As a result of the data obtained during the study, it was decided that we would not pursue a 510(k) clearance to promote the device. Changes in Cleared or Approved Devices. Certain modifications to our marketed devices, including certain manufacturing changes, product enhancements and product line extensions, require new 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA supplement. For devices marketed under an approved PMA, we must submit a PMA supplement to the FDA for review and approval prior to making a change to the device that affects the safety or effectiveness of the device, including changes to the design, manufacturing or labeling of the device. Likewise, for 510(k) cleared devices, we must obtain new FDA 510(k) clearance when there is a major change or modification in the intended use or indications for use or a change or modification of the device that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device. In some cases, clinical data may be required to support a PMA supplement or 510(k) premarket notification for a device modification. The FDA may determine that a modified device is not substantially equivalent to the marketed device or may require that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, either of which could significantly delay the introduction of modified devices. Quality System Requirements. The FDCA requires us to comply with the Quality System Regulation ( QSR ) and various foreign regulations require compliance with ISO 13485 or national law requirements pertaining to all aspects of our product design and manufacturing processes, including requirements for packaging, labeling, record keeping, personnel training, supplier qualification, design controls, complaint handling, corrective and preventive actions and internal auditing. The FDA and foreign regulators enforce these requirements through periodic inspections of medical device manufacturers. These requirements are complex, technical and require substantial resources to remain compliant. Our failure or the failure of our suppliers to maintain compliance with these requirements could result in the shutdown of our manufacturing operations or the recall of our products, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. If 1 of our suppliers fails to maintain compliance with our quality requirements, we may have to qualify a new supplier and could experience manufacturing delays as a result. We also could be subject to injunctions, product seizures, or civil or criminal penalties. Labeling and Promotion . Our labeling and promotional activities are also subject to scrutiny by the FDA and foreign regulators. Labeling includes not only the label on a device, but also includes any descriptive or informational literature that accompanies or is used to promote the device. Among other things, labeling violates the law if it is false or misleading in any respect or it fails to contain adequate directions for use. Moreover, product claims that are outside the approved or cleared labeling violate the FDCA and other applicable regulations. If the FDA determines that our promotional materials constitute promotion of an uncleared or unapproved use, or otherwise violate the FDCA, it could request that we modify our promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled letter, a notice of violation, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fines or criminal penalties. Allegations of off label promotion can also result in enforcement action by federal, state, or foreign enforcement authorities and trigger significant civil or criminal penalties, including exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid programs and liability under the False Claims Act, discussed further below. 17 Table of Contents Our product promotion is also subject to regulation by the Federal Trade Commission (the FTC ), which has primary oversight of the advertising of unrestricted devices. The Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce, as well as unfair or deceptive practices such as the dissemination of any false or misleading advertisement pertaining to medical devices. FTC enforcement can result in orders requiring, among other things, limits on advertising, corrective advertising, consumer redress, rescission of contracts and such other relief as the FTC may deem necessary. In addition, under the federal Lanham Act and similar state laws, competitors and others can initiate litigation relating to advertising claims. Import Requirements. To import a medical device into the United States, the importer must file an entry notice and bond with the United States Bureau of Customs and Border Protection ( CBP ). All devices are subject to FDA examination before release from the CBP. Any article that appears to be in violation of the FDCA may be refused admission and a notice of detention and hearing may be issued. If the FDA ultimately refuses admission, the CBP may issue a notice for redelivery and assess liquidated damages for up to 3 times the value of the lot. Additionally, the laws of the United States require imported articles to have their labels accurately marked with the appropriate country of origin, the violation of which may result in confiscation, fines and penalties. Export Requirements. Products for export from Europe or the United States are subject to foreign countries' import requirements and the exporting requirements of the FDA or European regulating bodies, as applicable. In particular, international sales of medical devices manufactured in the United States that are not approved or cleared by the FDA for use in the United States, or are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements and we may not be able to export such products. Foreign countries often require, among other things, an FDA certificate for products for export, also called a Certificate to Foreign Government. To obtain this certificate from the FDA, the device manufacturer must apply to the FDA. The FDA certifies that the product has been granted clearance or approval in the United States and that the manufacturing facilities were in compliance with the QSR at the time of the last FDA inspection. Additionally, the export of our products to certain countries is subject to restrictions due to trade and economic sanctions imposed by the United States, the European Union (the "EU") and other governments and organizations. The U.S. Departments of Justice, Commerce, State and Treasury and other federal agencies and authorities have a broad range of civil and criminal penalties they may seek to impose against corporations and individuals for violations of economic sanctions laws, export control laws, and other federal statutes and regulations, including those established by the Office of Foreign Assets Control ( OFAC ). Under these laws and regulations, as well as other export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations, various government agencies may require export licenses and may seek to impose modifications to business practices, including cessation of business activities in sancti1d countries or with sancti1d persons or entities. Additional Post market Requirements . Medical device manufacturers are also subject to other post market requirements, including product listing and establishment regulations, compliance with the FDA requirements for unique device identifiers, reports of corrections and removals and other requirements. Medical Device Reporting ( MDR ) requirements of the FDA, vigilance reporting requirements under the European Medical Devices Directive and similar regulations in other foreign markets, require manufacturers to report to the FDA or an equivalent foreign regulatory body any incident in which their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or a similar device were to recur. Our obligation to report under the MDR regulations is triggered on the date on which we become aware of an adverse event and the nature of the event. If we fail to comply with our MDR reporting obligations, the FDA could issue warning letters or untitled letters, take administrative actions, commence criminal prosecution, impose civil m1tary penalties, revoke our device clearances, seize our products, or delay the clearance of our future products. The FDA regularly inspects companies to determine compliance with the QSRs and other post market requirements. Failure to comply with statutory requirements and the FDA regulations can result in an FDA Form 483 (which is issued by the FDA at the conclusion of an inspection when an investigator has observed any conditions that may constitute violations), public warning letters, m1tary penalties against a company or its officers and employees, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory approvals, operating restrictions, total or partial suspension of production, injunctions, product recalls, product detentions, refusal to provide export certificates, seizure of products and criminal prosecution. Foreign Regulations. Medical device laws and regulations are also in effect in many countries outside of the United States. These laws and regulations vary significantly from country to country and range from comprehensive device approval 18 Table of Contents requirements for some or all of our medical device products to more basic requests for product data or certification. The number, scope, complexity, and cost of these requirements are increasing. Foreign regulatory approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such approvals, the loss of previously received approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The regulatory framework for medical devices in the European Economic Area underwent a significant revision in 2017, which has introduced new regulatory requirements to obtain CE Mark approval. The new Medical Device Regulations ( MDR ) include a 3 year transition period which is scheduled to end in 2020. The MDR includes increasingly stringent requirements in multiple areas, such as pre market clinical evidence (some of which are now in effect), review of high risk devices, labeling and post market surveillance. Under the MDR, pre market clinical data will now be required to obtain CE Mark approval for high risk, new and modified medical devices. We believe these new requirements have the potential to be expensive and time consuming to implement and maintain and could have a material adverse effect on our business. Reimbursement. Our products are generally used in medical procedures that are covered and reimbursed by governmental payers, such as Medicare, and or private health plans. In general, these third party payers cover a medical device and or related procedure only when the payer determines that healthcare outcomes are supported by medical evidence and the device or procedure is medically necessary for the diagnosis or treatment of the patient illness or injury. Even if a device has received clearance or approval for marketing by the FDA, there is no certainty that third party payers will cover and reimburse for the cost of the device and related procedures. Because of increasing cost containment pressures, some private payers in the U.S. and government payers in foreign countries may also condition payment on the cost effectiveness of the device or procedure. Even if coverage is available, third party payers may place restrictions on the circumstances in which they provide coverage or may offer reimbursement that is not sufficient to cover the cost of our products. If healthcare providers such as hospitals and physicians cannot obtain adequate coverage and reimbursement for our products or the procedures in which they are used, this may affect demand for our products and our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows could suffer a material adverse impact. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act ( Affordable Care Act ) has changed the way healthcare in the United States is financed by both governmental and private insurers and has significantly affected the medical device industry. This law contains a number of provisions, including provisions governing enrollment in federal healthcare programs, reimbursement changes, the increased funding of comparative effectiveness research for use in healthcare decision making, and enhancements to fraud and abuse requirements and enforcement, that we believe affect existing government healthcare programs and result in the development of new programs. The Affordable Care Act imposed on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices, which adversely affected our gross profit and earnings for our marketed products in 2015. The U.S. Congress suspended the excise tax for the 2016 and 2017 tax years and recently extended the suspension until January 1, 2020. We cannot predict whether any new action will be taken and whether the suspension will continue past 2020. If the excise tax is not repealed or further suspended, it will likely adversely impact our future results of operations. Additionally, the long term viability of the Affordable Care Act, and its impact on our business and results of operations, remains uncertain. For instance, in December 2017, the United States enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, which, among other things, eliminated the tax penalty for not obtaining health coverage (beginning in 2019). Additionally, members of the U.S. Congress have suggested other changes that may impact individual insurance marketplaces. These and other legislative and executive initiatives may significantly change the scope and impact of the Affordable Care Act and, in turn, the medical device industry. See Note 5 of the notes to our consolidated financial statements for further information on the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. The U.S. Physician Payment Sunshine Act, and similar state laws, also include annual reporting and disclosure requirements for device manufacturers aimed at increasing the transparency of the interactions between device manufacturers and healthcare providers. Reports submitted under these new requirements are placed in a public database. Other jurisdictions outside the United States have also begun adopting similar physician transparency laws. In addition to the burden of establishing processes for compliance, if we fail to provide these reports, or if the reports we provide are not accurate, we could be subject to significant penalties. Anti Corruption Laws. Anti bribery and anti corruption laws are in place in the United States and in many jurisdictions throughout the world. In the United States, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (the "FCPA") prohibits corruptly offering, paying, or promising to pay anything of value to foreign officials for the purpose of obtaining or maintaining business. Anti bribery laws present particular challenges in the medical device industry because in many countries including China, hospitals are state owned or operated by the government, and doctors and other hospital employees are considered foreign government officials. The FCPA 19 Table of Contents also requires that we maintain fair and accurate books and records and devise and maintain an adequate system of internal accounting controls. Among other requirements to implement compliance, we are required to train our U.S. and international employees, and to train and monitor foreign third parties with whom we contract, e.g ., distributors, to ensure compliance with these anti corruption laws. Failing to comply with the FCPA or any other anti corruption law could result in fines, penalties or other adverse consequences. In addition, t he Chinese government has also sponsored anti corruption campaigns from time to time, which could have a chilling effect on any future marketing efforts by us to new hospital customers. There have been recent occurrences in which certain hospitals have denied access to sales representatives from medical device companies because the hospitals wanted to avoid the perception of corruption. If this attitude becomes widespread among our potential customers, our ability to promote our products to hospitals may be adversely affected. As we expand our operations in China and other jurisdictions internationally, we will need to increase the scope of our compliance programs to address the risks relating to the potential for violations of the FCPA and other anti bribery and anti corruption laws. Our compliance programs will need to include policies addressing not only the FCPA, but also the provisions of a variety of anti bribery and anti corruption laws in multiple foreign jurisdictions, including China, provisions relating to books and records that apply to us as a public company, and include effective training for our personnel and relevant third parties. Anti Kickback Statutes. The federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, to a person to induce the purchase, order, lease, or recommendation of a good or service for which payment may be made in whole or part under a federal healthcare program such as Medicare or Medicaid, unless the arrangement fits within 1 of several statutory exemptions or regulatory safe harbors. The definition of remuneration has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including, for example, gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash and waivers of payments. Violations can result in significant penalties, imprisonment and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other federal healthcare programs. Exclusion of a manufacturer would preclude any federal healthcare program from paying for the manufacturer products. In addition, kickback arrangements can provide the basis for an action under the False Claims Act, which is discussed in more detail below. A party failure to fully satisfy a regulatory safe harbor provision may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities. Government officials have recently increased enforcement efforts on the sales and marketing activities of pharmaceutical, medical device and other healthcare companies, and recently have brought cases against individuals or entities that allegedly offered unlawful inducements to potential or existing customers to procure their business. Settlements of these government cases have involved significant fines and penalties and, in some instances, criminal pleas. In addition to the Anti Kickback Statute, many states have their own anti kickback laws. Often, these laws closely follow the language of the federal law, although they do not always have the same exceptions or safe harbors. In some states, these anti kickback laws apply with respect to all payers, including commercial health insurance companies. False Claims Laws. The False Claims Act prohibits any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to get a false claim paid. Manufacturers can be held liable under false claims laws, even if they do not submit claims to the government, if they are found to have caused submission of false claims. Under the Affordable Care Act, a violation of the Anti Kickback Statute is deemed to be a violation of the False Claims Act. The False Claims Act also includes whistleblower provisions that allow private citizens to bring suit against an entity or individual on behalf of the United States and to recover a portion of any m1tary recovery. Many of the recent, highly publicized settlements in the healthcare industry relating to sales and marketing practices have been cases brought under the False Claims Act. Most states also have adopted statutes or regulations similar to the federal laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs. Sanctions under the Federal Claims Act and state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer's products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines and imprisonment. Labor Standards Laws . We are also subject to corporate social responsibility ( CSR ) laws and regulations which require us to monitor the labor standards in our supply chain, including the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act, the UK Modern Slavery Act, and U.S. Federal Acquisition Regulations regarding Combating Trafficking in Persons. These CSR laws and regulations may impose additional processes and supplier management systems and have led certain key customers to impose additional requirements on medical device companies, including audits, as a prerequisite to selling products to such customers, which could result in increased costs for our products, the termination or suspension of certain suppliers, and reductions in our margins and profitability. Privacy and Security. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (the HITECH Act ), and accompanying rules, require certain 20 Table of Contents entities, referred to as "covered entities" (including most healthcare providers and health plans), to comply with established standards, including standards regarding the privacy and security of protected health information ( PHI ). HIPAA further requires that covered entities enter into agreements meeting certain regulatory requirements with their Business Associates, as such term is defined by HIPAA, which, among other things, obligate the Business Associates to safeguard the covered entity's PHI against improper use and disclosure. In addition, a Business Associate may face significant statutory and contractual liability if the Business Associate breaches the agreement or causes the covered entity to fail to comply with HIPAA. Additionally, many state laws regulate the use and disclosure of health information and require notification in the event of breach of such information. Although we do not believe we are a covered entity under HIPAA and do not meet the definition of Business Associate, we are committed to maintaining the security and privacy of patients health information and believe that we meet the expectations of the HIPAA rules in all material respects. However, to the extent we become subject to HIPAA, whether through a change in our business model or an enforcement action brought by the U.S. government, we would be directly subject to a broader range of requirements under HIPAA, HITECH, the rules issued thereunder and their respective civil and criminal penalties. The EU has recently adopted a comprehensive overhaul of its data protection regime from the current national legislative approach to a single EU privacy regulation, the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ), which applies as of May 25, 2018. The GDPR extends the scope of the EU data protection law to all companies processing personal data in the context of the activities of an establishment of a controller or a processor in the EU, regardless of whether the processing takes place in the EU or not. In addition, it applies to the processing of personal data of data subjects who are in the EU by a controller or processor not established in the EU, where the processing activities are related to (a) the offering of goods or services, irrespective of whether a payment of the data subject is required, to such data subjects in the EU; or (b) the monitoring of their behavior as far as their behavior takes place within the EU. The GDPR provides for a harmonization of the data protection regulations throughout the EU. It imposes a strict data protection compliance regime with severe penalties of up to the greater of 4% of worldwide turnover or 20 million and includes new rights such as the portability of personal data. Although the GDPR will apply across the EU without a need for local implementing legislation, it contains a number of opener clauses enabling the EU member states to provide for additional legislation. In addition, local data protection authorities will still have the ability to interpret the GDPR, which has the potential to create inconsistencies on a country by country basis. We are evaluating the rule and its requirements and are implementing changes to our business practices to comply with the GDPR. We post on our websites our privacy policies and practices regarding the collection, use and disclosure of user data. Any failure, or perceived failure, by us to comply with our posted privacy policies or with any applicable regulatory requirements or orders, or privacy, data protection, information security or consumer protection related privacy laws and regulations in 1 or more jurisdictions, could result in proceedings or actions against us by governmental entities or others, including class action privacy litigation in certain jurisdictions, subject us to significant fines, penalties, judgments and negative publicity, require us to change our business practices, increase the costs and complexity of compliance, and adversely affect our business. Data protection, privacy and information security have become the subject of increasing public, media and legislative concern. If our customers were to reduce their use of our products and services as a result of these concerns, our business could be materially harmed. As noted above, we are also subject to the possibility of security and privacy breaches, which themselves may result in a violation of these privacy laws. Environmental, Health and Safety Regulations. We are subject to various federal, state, local and foreign laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment, as well as public and employee health and safety. In the course of our business, we are involved in the handling, storage and disposal of certain chemicals. The laws and regulations applicable to our operations include provisions that regulate the release or discharge of hazardous or other regulated materials into the environment. These environmental laws and regulations may impose strict liability, rendering a person liable without regard to negligence or fault on the part of such person. Such environmental laws and regulations may expose us to liability for the conduct of, or conditions caused by, others, or for acts that were in non compliance with all applicable laws at the time the acts were performed. Failure to comply with applicable environmental laws could have a material adverse effect on our business. Our operations are also subject to various laws and regulations relating to occupational health and safety. We maintain safety, training and maintenance programs as part of our ongoing efforts to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Compliance with applicable health and safety laws and regulations has required and continues to require expenditures. Environmental, health and safety legislation and regulations change frequently. Changes in those regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Seasonality Our worldwide sales have not historically reflected a significant degree of seasonality; however, customer purchases have historically been lower during the third quarter of the year, as compared to other quarters. This reflects, among other factors, lower demand during summer months in countries in the northern hemisphere. 21 Table of Contents Employees As of December 31, 2017, we employed 4,876 people. N1 of our U.S. employees are subject to collective bargaining agreements; however, certain of our European employees are subject to such agreements. We believe our employee relations are generally good. Although our European employees will likely continue to be subject to collective organizing and bargaining activities, we do not expect such activities to materially affect our future operations. Recent Developments On February 14, 2018, we completed the acquisition of 2 product lines from BD pursuant to the terms of an asset purchase agreement, dated as of November 15, 2017 (the BD Agreement ). The acquisition occurred in connection with BD acquisition of C.R. Bard, Inc. ( Bard ). The purchase price for the acquired product lines and related assets was $100.1 million, subject to adjustment for fluctuations in the value of transferred inventory. We financed the acquisition through borrowings under our existing credit facility. Under the BD Agreement, we acquired soft tissue core needle biopsy products under the trade names of Achieve Programmable Automatic Biopsy System, Temno Biopsy System, and Tru Cut Biopsy Needles (which were previously sold by BD) as well as the Aspira Pleural Effusion Drainage Kits and the Aspira Perit1al Drainage System (which were previously sold by Bard). Available Information We file annual, quarterly and current reports and other information with the SEC. These materials can be inspected and copied at the SEC Public Reference Room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. Copies of these materials may also be obtained by mail at prescribed rates from the SEC Public Reference Room at the above address. Information about the Public Reference Room can be obtained by calling the SEC at 1 800 SEC 0330. The SEC also maintains an Internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. The address of the SEC Internet website is www.sec.gov. We make available, free of charge, on our Internet website, located at www.merit.com, our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 K, our most recent Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, any Current Reports on Form 8 K filed since our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 K, and any amendments to such reports as soon as reasonably practicable following the electronic filing of such report with the SEC. In addition, we provide electronic or paper copies of such filings free of charge upon request. Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Sales For financial information relating to our foreign and domestic sales see Note 12 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our business, operations and financial condition are subject to certain risks and uncertainties. Should 1 or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should any underlying assumptions prove incorrect, our actual results will vary, and may vary materially, from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected. Among the key factors that may have a direct bearing on our business, operations or financial condition are the factors identified below We may be unable to successfully manage growth, particularly if accomplished through acquisitions, and the integration of acquired businesses may present significant challenges that could harm our operations. Successful implementation of our business strategy will require that we effectively manage any associated growth. To manage growth effectively, our management will need to continue to implement changes in certain aspects of our business, to improve our information systems, infrastructure and operations to respond to increased demand, to attract and retain qualified personnel, and to develop, train, and manage an increasing number of management level and other employees. Growth could place an increasing strain on our management, financial, product design, marketing, distribution and other resources, and we could experience operating difficulties. Any failure to manage growth effectively could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. 22 Table of Contents Over the past several years, we completed a series of significant acquisitions. As we grow through acquisitions, we face the additional challenges of integrating the operations, culture, information management systems and other characteristics of the acquired entity with our own. Efforts to integrate future acquisitions may be hampered by delays, the loss of certain employees, suppliers or customers, proceedings resulting from employment terminations, culture clashes, unbudgeted costs, and other issues, which may occur at levels that are more severe or prolonged than anticipated. We have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, significant expenses in connection with negotiating and consummating various acquisition transactions, and we may inherit significant liabilities in connection with prospective acquisitions, including regulatory, infringement, product liability, discrimination or other legal claims or issues . In addition, we may not realize competitive advantages, synergies or other benefits anticipated in connection with any such acquisition. If we do not adequately identify targets for, or manage issues related to, our future acquisitions, such acquisitions may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We may not be able to effectively protect our intellectual property, which could harm our business and financial condition. Our ability to remain competitive is dependent, in part, upon our ability to protect our intellectual property rights and prevent other companies from using our intellectual property. We seek to protect our intellectual property rights through a combination of confidentiality and license agreements, and through patent, trademark, copyright and trade secret laws. However, all these measures afford only limited protection and may be challenged, invalidated, or circumvented by third parties. Additionally, these measures may not prevent competitors from duplicating our products or gaining access to our proprietary information and technology. Third parties may copy all or portions of our products or otherwise use our intellectual property without authorization, and we may not be able to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or use of our technical knowledge or trade secrets by consultants, vendors, former employees and current employees, despite the existence of nondisclosure and confidentiality agreements and other contractual restrictions, all of which could have an adverse effect on our business, operations, or financial condition. Third parties may also develop similar or superior technology independently or by designing around our patents. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries do not offer the same level of protection for our intellectual property as the laws of the U.S. Further, no assurances can be given that any patent application we have filed or will file will result in a patent being issued, or that any existing or future patents will afford adequate or meaningful protection against competitors or against similar technologies. All of our patents will eventually expire and some of our patents, including patents protecting significant elements of our technology, will expire within the next several years. Filing, prosecuting and defending our intellectual property in all countries throughout the world may be prohibitively expensive. Litigation may be necessary in the future to enforce our intellectual property rights, protect our trade secrets or to determine the validity and scope of proprietary rights claimed by others. Any such lawsuits that we might initiate could be expensive, take significant time and divert management's attention from our business. Litigation also puts our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly. Additionally, we may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. Moreover, the legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the aggressive enforcement of patent and other intellectual property protection, which makes it difficult to stop infringement. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially valuable. Third parties claiming that we infringe their intellectual property rights could cause us to incur significant legal or licensing expenses and prevent us from selling our products. Our commercial success will depend in part on not infringing or violating the intellectual property rights of others. From time to time, third parties may claim that we have infringed their intellectual property rights, including claims regarding patents, copyrights, trademarks, and trade secrets. We may not be aware of whether our products do or will infringe existing or future patents or the intellectual property rights of others. Because of constant technological change in the medical device industry in which we compete, the extensive patent coverage of existing technologies, and the rapid rate of issuance of new patents, it is possible that the number of these claims may grow. In addition, former employers of our former, current, or future employees may assert claims that such employees have improperly disclosed to us the confidential or proprietary information of these former employers. Any such claim, with or without merit, could result in costly litigation, distract management from day to day operations and harm our brand or reputation, which in turn could harm our business or results of operations. If we are not successful in defending such claims, we could be required to stop selling, delay shipments of, or redesign, our products, discontinue the use of related trademarks, technologies or designs, pay m1tary amounts as damages, enter into royalty or licensing arrangements or satisfy indemnification obligations that we have with some of our customers. Royalty or licensing arrangements that we may seek in such circumstances may not be available to us on commercially reasonable terms or at all and we may not be able to redesign applicable products in a way to avoid infringing the intellectual property rights of others. We have made and expect to continue making significant expenditures to investigate, defend and settle claims related to the use of technology and intellectual property rights as part of our strategy to manage this risk. 23 Table of Contents The medical device industry is experiencing greater scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities. Moreover, in October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on our marketing and promotional practices. If governmental authorities determine that we have violated laws or regulations, including in respect of our marketing or promotional practices, our company or our employees may be subject to various penalties, including civil or criminal penalties. Our medical devices and business activities are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. These authorities and members of Congress have been increasing their scrutiny of the medical device industry. In recent years, the U.S. Congress, Department of Justice, the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Defense have issued subpoenas and other requests for information to medical device manufacturers, primarily related to financial arrangements with healthcare providers, regulatory compliance and product promotional practices. If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, we may be subjected to a wide variety of sanctions and enforcement actions, including warning letters that require corrective action, injunctions, product seizures or recalls, suspension of product manufacturing, revocation of approvals, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, civil fines and criminal penalties. In October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on certain of our marketing and promotional practices. Although we are in the process of responding to the subpoena, we may not be able to resolve this matter, or similar matters that may arise in the future, without our company or employees incurring significant fines, penalties, or other adverse civil or criminal consequences. Even if we are successful in resolving the pending matter without such consequences, we have incurred, and anticipate that we will continue to incur, substantial costs in connection with the matter. The pending matter, or other governmental proceedings, could significantly impact our reputation and divert management attention and resources from growing our business, which in turn could harm our business, results of operations, financial condition and ability to obtain financing on reasonable terms or at all. We anticipate that government authorities will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation by government authorities may increase compliance costs, exposure to litigation and other adverse effects on our operations. Use of our products in unapproved circumstances could expose us to liabilities. The marketing approvals from the FDA and other regulators of certain of our products are, or are expected to be, limited to specific uses. We are prohibited from marketing or promoting any unapproved use of our product. However, physicians may use these products in ways or circumstances other than those strictly within the scope of the regulatory approval. The use of our products for unauthorized purposes could arise from our sales personnel or distributors violating our policies by providing information or recommendations about such unauthorized uses. Consequently, claims may be asserted by the FDA or other enforcement agencies that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations or have improperly promoted our products for uncleared or unapproved uses. The FDA or such other agencies could require a recall of products or allege that our promotional activities misbrand or adulterate our products or violate other legal requirements, which could result in investigations, prosecutions, fines or other civil or criminal actions. The FDA regulatory clearance process is expensive, time consuming and uncertain, and the failure to obtain and maintain required regulatory clearances and approvals could prevent us from commercializing our products. Before we can introduce a new device or a new use of or a claim for a cleared device in the United States, we must generally obtain market clearance from the FDA through the 510(k) premarket notification process or through a PMA application, unless an exemption for lower risk devices or an alternative procedure, such as a de novo classification request or a humanitarian device exemption, applies. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and time consuming. If human clinical trials of a medical device are required for FDA clearance or approval and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial must file an IDE application with the FDA prior to commencing such trials in the U.S. Submission of an IDE application does not ensure that the FDA will issue the IDE. If the IDE application is approved, there can be no assurance the FDA will determine that the data derived from the trials support the safety and effectiveness of the device or warrant the continuation of clinical trials. For clinical trials involving a device that does not present a significant risk, the sponsor is not required to obtain approval of an IDE, but the sponsor must obtain the review and approval of an institutional review board. Both significant risk and non significant risk trials are subject to additional FDA regulations, including a requirement to obtain informed consent and reporting and recordkeeping requirements. We, the FDA, or the institutional review board, may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. 24 Table of Contents We are also required to seek FDA clearance for certain manufacturing changes, product enhancements and product line extensions, which may require new 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA supplement. For devices marketed under an approved PMA, we must submit a PMA supplement to the FDA for review and approval prior to making a change to the device that affects the safety or effectiveness of the device, including changes to the design, manufacturing or labeling of the device. Likewise, for 510(k) cleared devices, we must obtain new FDA 510(k) clearance when there is a major change or modification in the intended use or indications for use or a change or modification of the device that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device. In some cases, clinical data may be required to support a PMA supplement or 510(k) premarket notification for a device modification. The FDA requires every manufacturer to make the determination regarding the need for a new 510(k) submission or a PMA supplement in the first instance, but the FDA may review the manufacturer decisions not to seek a new 510(k) or PMA supplement. We may make changes to our cleared products without seeking additional clearances or approvals if we believe such clearances or approvals are not necessary. However, the FDA may disagree and determine that such a modified device is not substantially equivalent to the marketed device or may require additional information, including clinical data, to be submitted before a determination is made, in which case we may be required to delay the introduction and marketing of our modified products, redesign our products, conduct clinical trials to support any modifications and pay significant regulatory fines or penalties. In addition, the FDA may not approve or clear our products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. There is no assurance that we will be able to obtain the necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Further, the FDA may change its clearance and approval policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions which may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently cleared products on a timely basis. Delays in receipt of, or failure to obtain, regulatory clearances for any product enhancements or new products we develop would result in delayed or no realization of revenue from such product enhancements or new products and in substantial additional costs, which could decrease our profitability. In addition, we are required to continue to comply with applicable FDA and other regulatory requirements once we have obtained clearance for a product. We cannot assure you that we will successfully maintain the clearances we have received or may receive in the future. In addition, our existing clearances can be revoked if any issues arise that bring into question our products safety or effectiveness. The loss of previously received clearances or approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could also have a material adverse effect on our business. We rely on the proper function, availability and security of information technology systems to operate our business and a material disruption of critical information systems or a material breach in the security of our systems may adversely affect our business and customer relationships. We rely on information technology systems (including technology from third party providers) to process, transmit, and store electronic information in our day to day operations, including sensitive personal information and proprietary or confidential information. We also rely on our technology infrastructure, among other functions, to interact with customers and suppliers, fulfill orders and bill, collect and make payments, ship products, provide support to customers, fulfill contractual obligations and otherwise conduct business. Our internal information technology systems, as well as those systems maintained by third party providers, may be subjected to computer viruses or other malicious codes, unauthorized access attempts, and cyber attacks, any of which could result in data leaks or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Cyber attacks are becoming more sophisticated and frequent, and there can be no assurance that our protective measures will prevent security breaches that could have a significant impact on our business, reputation and financial results, particularly attacks that result in our intellectual property and other confidential information being accessed or stolen. Cyber attacks could also result in unauthorized access to our systems and products, including personal information of individuals, which could also result in actions by regulatory bodies or civil litigation. If we fail to monitor, maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity effectively or fail to anticipate, plan for or manage significant disruptions to these systems, we could, among other things, lose customers, be subject to fraud, breach our agreements with or duties toward customers, physicians, other health care professionals and employees, be subject to regulatory sanctions or penalties, incur expenses or lose revenues or suffer other adverse consequences. Unauthorized tampering, adulteration or interference with our products may also create issues with product functionality that could result in a loss of data, risk to patient safety, and product recalls or field actions. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We are subject to export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations in the U.S. and other countries. If we fail to comply with these laws, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, other remedial measures and legal expenses, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. 25 Table of Contents Our global operations expose us to trade and economic sanctions and other restrictions imposed by the United States, the EU and other governments and organizations. The U.S. Departments of Justice, Commerce, State and Treasury and other federal agencies and authorities have a broad range of civil and criminal penalties they may seek to impose against corporations and individuals for violations of economic sanctions laws, export control laws, and other federal statutes and regulations, including those established by the Office of Foreign Asset Control. Under these laws and regulations, as well as other export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations, various government agencies may require export licenses, may seek to impose modifications to business practices, including cessation of business activities in sancti1d countries or with sancti1d persons or entities and modifications to compliance programs, which may increase compliance costs, and may subject us to fines, penalties and other sanctions. A violation of these laws or regulations could adversely impact our business, results of operations and financial condition. A significant adverse change in, or failure to comply with, governing regulations could adversely affect our business, operations or financial condition. We have extensive global operations, which necessitate that we seek various regulatory approvals for our products in the jurisdictions where our products are sold. Different regulatory requirements for product approvals and our need to comply with different regulatory regimes could impact our business. Substantially all of our products are devices, as defined in the FDCA, and the manufacture, distribution, record keeping, labeling and advertisement of substantially all of our products are subject to regulation by the FDA in the United States and equivalent regulatory agencies in various foreign countries in which our products are manufactured, distributed, labeled, offered or sold. Further, we are subject to regular review and periodic inspections at our facilities with respect to compliance with the FDCA, QSR, ISO standards and similar requirements of foreign countries, which may cover, among others, the procedures and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, sterilization, storage and shipment of medical devices. Costs to comply with regulations, including, for instance, regulations for medical devices enacted by the EU in May 2017 and effective in 2020, and costs associated with remediation can be significant. Additionally, failure to comply with such requirements, or later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products or our third party manufacturers manufacturing processes, including any failure to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse QSR inspection, could result in total or partial suspension of production or distribution, a regulatory agency refusal to grant pending or future clearances or approvals for our products, withdrawal or suspension of regulatory clearances or approvals, clinical holds, warning letters or untitled letters or refusal to permit the import or export of our products. The agreements and instruments governing our debt contain restrictions and limitations that could significantly affect our ability to operate our business, as well as significantly affect our liquidity. We have entered into a Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as administrative agent, swingline lender and a lender, Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as sole lead arranger and sole bookrunner and the lenders who are or may become party thereto, which was amended on September 28, 2016, March 20, 2017 and December 13, 2017 (as amended, the "Second Amended Credit Agreement"). The Second Amended Credit Agreement contains a number of significant covenants that could adversely affect our ability to operate our business, our liquidity or our results of operations. These covenants restrict, among other things, our incurrence of indebtedness, creation of liens or pledges on our assets, mergers or similar combinations or liquidations, asset dispositions, repurchases or redemptions of equity interests or debt, issuances of equity, payment of dividends and certain distributions and entry into related party transactions. We have pledged substantially all of our assets as collateral for the Second Amended Credit Agreement. Our breach of any covenant in the Second Amended Credit Agreement, not otherwise cured, waived or amended, could result in a default under that agreement and could trigger acceleration of the underlying obligations. Any default under the Second Amended Credit Agreement could adversely affect our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations. The administrative agent and lenders under the Second Amended Credit Agreement have available to them the remedies typically available to lenders and secured parties, including the ability to foreclose on the collateral we have pledged. Any default under the Second Amended Credit Agreement would at a minimum harm our ability to service our debt and to fund our prospective capital expenditures and ongoing operations. It could lead to an acceleration of indebtedness and foreclosure on our assets. As currently amended, the Second Amended Credit Agreement provides for potential borrowings of up to $525.0 million. Such increased borrowing limits may make it more difficult for us to comply with leverage ratios and other restrictive covenants in the Second Amended Credit Agreement. We may also have less cash available for operations and investments in our business, as we will be required to use additional cash to satisfy the minimum payment obligations associated with this increased indebtedness. 26 Table of Contents We will be required to expend significant resources for research, development, testing and regulatory approval or clearance of our products under development and these products may not be developed successfully or approved for commercial use. Most of our products under development will require significant additional research, development, engineering and, in some cases, preclinical and clinical testing, as well as regulatory approval or clearance and a commitment of significant additional resources prior to their commercialization. It is possible that our products may not be developed successfully; be proven safe or effective in clinical trials; offer therapeutic or other improvements over current treatments and products; meet applicable regulatory standards or receive regulatory approvals or clearances; be capable of production in commercial quantities at acceptable costs and in compliance with regulatory requirements; be successfully marketed; or be covered by private or public insurers. We are currently conducting 1 clinical trial in an effort to obtain approval from the FDA that would enable us to expand our efforts to commercialize the QuadraSphere Microspheres. EU regulations do not currently require such applications for these classes of medical device. In order for us to obtain FDA approval to promote the use of QuadraSphere Microspheres for the purposes indicated in our clinical trial, we will need to complete the trial and submit positive clinical data to the FDA. If we cannot enroll study subjects in sufficient numbers to complete the necessary study, if there is a disruption in the supply of materials for the trial or if any other factors preclude us from completing the trial in a timely manner, we will likely not be able to complete the trial. Even if we complete the clinical trial, the FDA may require us to undertake additional testing, or the trial results may not be sufficient to obtain FDA approval for other reasons, including inconclusive or negative results of our trials or those conducted by our competitors or other third parties. Any clinical trials we undertake in the future will likely be subject to these and similar risks. If we do not obtain FDA approval or clearance of the product use claimed in a clinical trial, we will not be able to promote the subject product for the indicated treatment of the specific disease or condition in the United States. We are subject to laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, the violation of which could adversely affect our business or financial results. Our operations are subject to various state and federal laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including the federal Anti Kickback Statute and other anti kickback laws, which prohibit any person from knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce or reward either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for an item or service, for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Violations of these fraud and abuse related laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid, any of which could harm our business or financial results. We are also subject to the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions. These laws generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from illegally offering things of value to any individual for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. As we continue to expand our business activities internationally, compliance with the FCPA and other anti bribery laws presents greater challenges to our operations. If our employees or agents violate the provisions of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, we may incur fines or penalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results or financial condition. Healthcare reform legislation has negatively affected our financial results and may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. The Affordable Care Act was enacted into law in March 2010, and most of the core pieces of the Affordable Care Act are now in effect. Certain other provisions of the legislation are not yet effective. There are many programs and requirements for which the details have not yet been fully established or consequences not fully understood, and it is unclear what the full impact 27 Table of Contents of the legislation will be. The law imposes on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices. Although this tax has been suspended until January 1, 2020, during the year ended December 31, 2015 we incurred $4.3 million related to this tax, which reduced our gross profit by 0.8%. We cannot predict whether the suspension will be continued beyond January 1, 2020. If the excise tax is not repealed or further suspended, it will likely adversely impact our future results of operations. In addition, the costs of compliance with the Affordable Care Act reporting and disclosure requirements, frequently identified as the Sunshine Act, with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to healthcare providers may have a material, negative impact on our results of operations and our cash flows. Additionally, the long term viability of the Affordable Care Act, and its impact on our business and results of operations, remains uncertain. For instance, in December 2017, the United States enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, which, among other things, eliminated the tax penalty for not obtaining health coverage (beginning in 2019). Additionally, members of the U.S. Congress have suggested other changes that may impact individual insurance marketplaces. These and other legislative and executive initiatives may significantly change the scope and impact of the Affordable Care Act and, in turn, the medical device industry. We are subject to the regulations of our medical devices in foreign countries in which we sell our products and we will be required to expend significant resources for obtaining regulatory approval or clearance of our products and there may be delays and uncertainty in obtaining regulatory approval. To be able to sell our products in foreign countries, we must obtain regulatory approvals and comply with the regulations of those countries. These regulations, including the requirements for approvals and the time required for regulatory review, vary from country to country. The EU requires that manufacturers of medical devices obtain the right to affix the CE mark, for compliance with the Medical Device Directive (93 42 EEC), as amended, to medical devices before selling them in member countries of the EU. The CE mark is an international symbol of adherence to quality assurance standards and compliance with applicable European medical device directives. In order to obtain the authorization to affix the CE mark to products, a manufacturer must obtain certification that its processes and products meet certain European quality standards. In April 2017, the EU adopted the Medical Device Regulation to replace the Medical Device Directive (93 42 EEC), as amended. The Medical Device Regulation will apply after a 3 year transition period and imposes stricter requirements for the marketing and sale of medical devices and grants Notified Bodies increased post market surveillance authority. Complying with and obtaining regulatory approval in foreign countries have caused or may cause us to experience more uncertainty, risk, expense and delay in commercializing products in certain foreign jurisdictions, which could affect our ability to obtain approvals for our products in those jurisdictions and adversely impact our net sales, market share and operating profits from our international operations. We are dependent upon key personnel. Our success is dependent on key management personnel, including Fred P. Lampropoulos, our Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Lampropoulos is not subject to any agreement prohibiting his departure, and we do not maintain key man life insurance on his life. The loss of Mr. Lampropoulos, or of certain other key management personnel, could have a materially adverse effect on our business and operations. Our success also depends on, among other factors, the successful recruitment and retention of key operating, manufacturing, sales and other personnel. Our products may be subject to product liability claims. Our products are used in connection with invasive procedures and in other medical contexts that entail an inherent risk of product liability claims. If medical personnel or their patients suffer injury or death in connection with the use of our products, whether as a result of a failure of our products to function as designed, an inappropriate design, inadequate disclosure of product related risks or information, improper use, or for any other reason, we could be subject to lawsuits seeking significant compensatory and punitive damages. Product liability claims may be brought by individuals or by groups seeking to represent a class. We have previously faced claims by patients claiming injuries from our products. To date, these claims have not resulted in material harm to our operations or financial condition. The outcome of this type of personal injury litigation is difficult to assess or quantify. We maintain product liability insurance; however, there is no assurance that this coverage will be sufficient to satisfy any claim made against us. Moreover, any product liability claim brought against us could result in significant costs, divert our management attention from other business matters or operations, increase our product liability insurance rates, or prevent us from securing insurance coverage in the future. As a result, any lawsuit seeking significant m1tary damages may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. 28 Table of Contents In addition, the occurrence of such an event or claim could result in a recall of products from the market or a safety alert relating to such products. Such a recall could result in significant costs, reduce our revenue, divert management's attention from our business, and harm our reputation. Our products may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to the FDA, and if we fail to do so, we may be subject to sanctions that may materially harm our business. Our products are subject to medical device reporting regulations, which require us to report to the FDA any incident in which our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or in which our products malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, it could likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Our obligation to report under the medical device reporting regulations is triggered on the date on which we become aware of an adverse event and the nature of the event. We may fail to report adverse events of which we become aware within the prescribed timeframe. We may also fail to recognize that we have become aware of a reportable adverse event, especially if it is not reported to us as an adverse event or if it is an adverse event that is unexpected or if the product characteristic that caused the adverse event is removed in time from our products. If we fail to comply with our medical device reporting obligations, the FDA could issue warning letters or untitled letters, take administrative actions, commence criminal prosecution, impose civil m1tary penalties, revoke our device clearances, demand or initiate a product recall, seize our products, or delay the clearance of our future products. We generally offer a limited warranty for the return of product due to defects in quality and workmanship. We attempt to estimate our potential liability for future product returns and establish reserves on our financial statements in amounts that we believe will be sufficient to address our warranty obligations; however, our actual liability for product returns may significantly exceed the amount of our reserves. If we underestimate our potential liability for future product returns, or if unanticipated events result in returns that exceed our historical experience, our financial condition and operating results could be materially harmed. We lack direct sales and marketing capabilities in many countries, and are wholly dependent on our distributors for the commercialization of our products in these countries. If we are unable to maintain or establish sales capabilities on our own or through third parties, we may not be able to commercialize any of our products in those countries. We have no or limited direct sales or marketing capabilities in some of the regions and countries in which our products are sold, including, among others, China, Japan, Russia and India. We have entered into distribution agreements with third parties to market and sell our products in those countries in which we do not have a direct sales force and in those countries in which we utilize a "modified direct" sales approach. If we are unable to maintain or enter into such distribution arrangements on acceptable terms, or at all, we may not be able to successfully commercialize our products in certain countries. Moreover, to the extent that we enter into distribution arrangements with other companies, our revenues, if any, will depend on the terms of any such arrangements and the efforts of others. These efforts may turn out not to be sufficient and our third party distributors may not effectively sell our products. In addition, although our contract terms require our distributors to comply with all applicable laws regarding the sale of our products, including anti competition, anti corruption, anti m1y laundering and sanctions laws, we may not be able to ensure proper compliance. If our distributors fail to effectively market and sell our products in full compliance with applicable laws, our results of operations and business could be impacted. Our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in misconduct or other improper activities, including noncompliance with regulatory standards and requirements. We are exposed to the risk that our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in fraudulent conduct or other illegal activity. Misconduct by these parties could include intentional, reckless or negligent conduct or disclosure of unauthorized activities to us that violates healthcare laws and regulations of the FDA and other federal, state and international authorities, manufacturing standards, and laws that require the true, complete and accurate reporting of financial information or data. We have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics, and a global anti corruption policy, but it is not always possible to identify and deter misconduct, and the precautions we take to detect and prevent this activity may not be effective in controlling unknown or unmanaged risks or losses or in protecting us from governmental investigations or other actions or lawsuits stemming from a failure to be in compliance with such laws or regulations. If any such actions are instituted against us, and we are not successful in defending ourselves or asserting our rights, those actions could have a significant impact on our business, including the imposition of significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties. The size of the market for our product groups has not been established with precision and may be smaller than we estimate. Our estimates of the annual total addressable market for our cardiac intervention, peripheral intervention, interventional oncology and spine, and cardiovascular and critical care and endoscopy product groups are based on a number of internal and 29 Table of Contents third party estimates, including published industry data. While we believe these factors have historically provided and may continue to provide us with effective tools in estimating the total market for our products, these estimates may not be correct and the conditions supporting our estimates may change at any time, thereby reducing the predictive accuracy of the underlying factors we consider in our analysis. As a result, our estimates of the annual total addressable market for our products may prove to be incorrect. If the actual number of patients who would benefit from our products and the annual total addressable market for our products is smaller than we have estimated, our sales growth may be impaired and our business adversely impacted. Even if the markets are as large as projected, there is no assurance that our market share or aggregate sales will increase as a result of the size of addressable markets. Consolidation in the healthcare industry, group purchasing organizations or public procurement policies could lead to demands for price concessions, which may harm our ability to sell our products at prices necessary to support our current business strategies. Healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, which has resulted in or led to numerous cost reform initiatives by legislators, regulators and third party payers. Cost reform has triggered a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to aggregate purchasing power, which may create more requests for pricing concessions in the future. Additionally, group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks, public procurement policies and large single accounts may continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions for hospitals and healthcare service providers. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party coverage and reimbursement policies and societal pressures will continue to change the healthcare industry worldwide, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. We may be unable to compete in our markets, particularly if there is a significant change in relevant practices or technology. The markets in which our products compete are highly competitive. We face competition from many companies which are larger, better established, have greater financial, technical and other resources and possess a greater market presence than we do. Such resources and market presence may enable our competitors to more effectively market competing products or to market competing products at reduced prices in order to gain market share. In addition, our ability to compete successfully is dependent, in part, upon our response to changes in technology and upon our efforts to develop and market new products which achieve significant market acceptance. Competing companies with substantially greater resources than us are actively engaged in research and development of new methods, treatments, drugs, and procedures to treat or prevent cardiovascular disease that could limit the market for our products and eventually make some of our products obsolete. A reduction in the demand for a significant number of our products, or a few key products, could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Our business is subject to complex and evolving U.S. and international laws and regulation regarding privacy and data protection. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business. The U.S. and many other countries in which we conduct our operations have adopted laws and regulations protecting certain data, including medical and personal data, and requiring data holders and controllers to implement administrative, logical and technical controls and procedures. In addition, regulatory authorities around the world are considering a number of additional proposals concerning data protection. These laws and regulations have been, and may continue to be, inconsistent with each other, requiring different approaches in different jurisdictions. In addition, the interpretation and application of medical and personal data protection laws in the U.S., Europe, China and elsewhere are often uncertain and in flux. It is possible that these laws may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent with our data practices. These legislative and regulatory proposals, if adopted, and such interpretations could, in addition to the possibility of fines, result in an order requiring that we change our data practices, which could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Complying with these various laws could cause us to incur substantial costs or require us to change our business practices in a manner adverse to our business. Recent legal developments in Europe have created compliance uncertainty regarding certain transfers of personal data from the European Union ( EU ) to the United States and other non EU jurisdictions. For example, the GDPR, scheduled to come into application in the EU on May 25, 2018, will apply to all of our activities conducted from an establishment in the EU or related to products and services that we offer to EU users. The GDPR will create a range of new compliance obligations, which could cause us to change our business practices, and will significantly increase financial penalties for noncompliance (including possible fines of up to 4% of global annual turnover for the preceding financial year or 20 million (whichever is higher) for the most serious infringements). 30 Table of Contents Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates may negatively impact our financial results. As our operations have grown outside the United States, we have also become increasingly subject to market risk relating to foreign currency. Those fluctuations could have a negative impact on our margins and financial results. During 2017, 2016 and 2015, the exchange rate between all applicable foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar resulted in an increase in net sales of approximately $0.6 million, a decrease of approximately $4.9 million and a decrease of approximately $113 million, respectively. For the year ended December 31, 2017, approximately $215.8 million, or 29.7%, of our net sales were denominated in foreign currencies, with our Euro denominated sales representing our largest single currency risk. If the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, we may not be able to increase the prices we charge our customers for products whose prices are denominated in those respective foreign currencies. Furthermore, we may be unable or elect not to enter into hedging transactions which could mitigate the effect of declining exchange rates. As a result, if the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, our financial results may be negatively impacted. Termination or interruption of, or a failure to monitor, our supply relationships and increases in the price of our comp1nt parts, finished products, third party services or raw materials, particularly petroleum based products, could have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We rely on raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished products and third party services in connection with our business. For example, substantially all of our products are sterilized by only a few different entities. Additionally, many of our products have comp1nts that are manufactured using resins, plastics and other petroleum based materials which are available from a limited number of suppliers. We are experiencing a growing trend among suppliers of polymer resins to refuse to supply resin to the medical device manufacturers or to require such manufacturers to assume additional risks due to the potential for product liability claims. Additionally, there is no assurance that crude oil supplies will be uninterrupted or that petroleum based manufacturing materials will be available for purchase in the future. Any interruption to the supply of polymers or petroleum based resins could have an adverse effect on our ability to produce, or on the cost to produce, our products. The availability and price of these materials is affected by a variety of factors beyond our control, including the willingness of suppliers to sell into the medical device industry, changes in supply and demand, general economic conditions, labor costs, fuel related transportation costs, competition, import duties, tariffs, currency exchange rates and political uncertainty around the world. Our suppliers may pass some of their cost increases on to us, and if such increased costs are sustained or increase further, our suppliers may pass further cost increases on to us. In addition to the effect on resin prices, transportation costs generally increase based on the effect of higher crude oil prices, and these increased transportation costs may be passed on to us. We are also subject to CSR laws and regulations which require us to monitor the labor standards in our supply chain, including the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act, the UK Modern Slavery Act, and U.S. Federal Acquisition Regulations regarding Combating Trafficking in Persons. These CSR labor laws and regulations may impose additional processes and supplier management systems and have led certain key customers to impose additional requirements on medical device companies, including audits, as a prerequisite to selling products to such customers, which could result in increased costs for our products, the termination or suspension of certain suppliers, and reductions in our margins and profitability. Our ability to recover such increased costs may depend upon our ability to raise prices on our products. Due to the highly competitive nature of the healthcare industry and the cost containment efforts of our customers and third party payers, we may be unable to pass along cost increases through higher prices. If we are unable to fully recover these costs through price increases or offset these increases through cost reductions or we experience terminations or interruption of our relationships with our suppliers we could experience lower margins and profitability, and our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be materially harmed. We may be unable to accurately forecast customer demand for our products and manage our inventory. To ensure adequate supply, we must forecast our inventory needs and place orders with our suppliers based on estimates of future demand for particular products. Our ability to accurately forecast demand for our products could be negatively affected by many factors, including our failure to accurately manage our expansion strategy and customer acceptance of new products, product introductions by our competitors, an increase or decrease in customer demand for our products or for products of our competitors, unanticipated changes in general market conditions or regulatory matters and weakening of economic conditions or consumer confidence in future economic conditions. Inventory levels in excess of customer demand may result in inventory write downs or write offs, which would impact our gross margin. Conversely, if we underestimate customer demand for our products, 31 Table of Contents our manufacturing facilities may not be able to deliver products to meet our order requirements, which could damage our reputation and customer relationships. International and national economic and industry conditions constantly change, and could harm our business and results of operations. Our business and our results of operation are affected by many changing economic, industry and other conditions beyond our control, including, for instance, potential changes to the economic relationship between the United States and Mexico, China, and other countries in which we operate as a result of the new U.S. administration, and other changes and developments that we cannot anticipate, each of which could harm our business and results of operations. Actual or potential changes in international, national, regional and local economic, business and financial conditions, including recession, inflation and trade protection measures, may negatively affect consumer preferences, perceptions, spending patterns or demographic trends, any of which could harm our business or results of operations. Our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations, which may harm their ability or decision to purchase or pay for our products. Disruptions in the credit markets have previously resulted, and could again result, in volatility, decreased liquidity, widening of credit spreads, and reduced availability of financing. There can be no assurance that future financing will be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. An inability to obtain necessary additional financing on acceptable terms may have an adverse impact on us and on our ability to implement our business plan. In particular, the new U.S. Administration has called for and may introduce substantial changes to fiscal, healthcare, trade and tax policies and legislation, which may include comprehensive tax reform and changes to existing trade agreements, including, but not limited to, the North American Free Trade Agreement ( NAFTA ). Such changes may have a significant impact on our operations and financial results. In particular, the potential enactment of tariffs on goods imported into the U.S., including but not limited to, goods imported from Mexico where we manufacture many of our products that we sell internationally, could adversely affect our gross profit margins. If enacted, any legislation by the U.S. federal government that restricts trade, such as tariffs, trade barriers, and other protectionist or retaliatory measures taken by governments in Europe, Asia, and other regions, could adversely impact our ability to sell products and services internationally. We cannot predict the impact, if any, of these changes to our business. If economic conditions worsen or fail to improve, changes in legislation impact the relationship between the U.S. and Mexico and other countries in which we operate or the continuity of NAFTA and other trade agreements, or new legislation is passed related to the healthcare system, fiscal or tax policies, customer demand may not materialize to the levels we require to achieve our anticipated financial results, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows. On June 23, 2016, the United Kingdom held a referendum in which voters approved an exit from the EU, commonly referred to as Brexit . As a result of the referendum, negotiations are under way to determine the future terms of the United Kingdom relationship with the EU, including the terms of trade. As it stands, the United Kingdom will depart the EU on March 30, 2019 but the terms of its withdrawal and the nature of its future relationship with the EU are still being decided. In December 2017, EU leaders announced an agreement to begin the next phase of negotiations, with talks on a transition period after March 2019 to begin in early 2018 and discussions on the future UK EU relationship, including trade and security, to begin in March 2018. It is possible that there will be greater restrictions on the movement of goods and people between the United Kingdom and the EU countries and increased regulatory complexities, which could affect our ability to sell products in certain EU countries and in the United Kingdom. Brexit could adversely affect European and worldwide economic and market conditions and could further contribute to instability in global financial and foreign exchange markets, including volatility in the value of the British pound and Euro, to which we have significant exposure. In addition, other European countries may seek to conduct referenda with respect to continuing membership with the EU. The uncertainties surrounding Brexit are such that we do not know to what extent such changes will impact our business. The above developments, and others that we cannot anticipate, could adversely affect our business, operations and financial results. We depend on generating sufficient cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures, and ongoing operations. We are dependent on our cash on hand and free cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures and ongoing operations. Our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations will depend on our ability to continue to generate cash flow. If we are unable to generate sufficient cash flow or we are unable to access additional liquidity sources, we may not be able to service or repay our debt, operate our business, respond to competitive challenges, or fund our other liquidity and capital needs. A significant portion of our revenues is derived from a few products and medical procedures. 32 Table of Contents A significant portion of our revenues is attributable to sales of our inflation devices. During the year ended December 31, 2017, sales of our inflation devices (including our Big60 device sold within our endoscopy segment and kits and packs which include inflation devices, but also include other products) accounted for approximately 114% of our net sales. Any material decline in market demand, or change in OEM supplier preference, for our inflation devices could have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, the products that have accounted for a majority of our historical revenues are designed for use in connection with a few related medical procedures, including angioplasty, stent placement procedures, and spinal procedures. If subsequent developments in medical technology or drug therapy make such procedures obsolete, or alter the methodology of such procedures so as to eliminate the usefulness of our products, we may experience a material decrease in demand for our products and experience deteriorating financial performance. The market price of our common stock has been, and may continue to be, volatile. The market price of our common stock has at times been, and may in the future be, volatile for various reasons, including those discussed in these risks factors, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Other events that could cause volatility in our stock, include without limitation, variances in our financial results; analysts and other projections or recommendations regarding our common stock specifically or medical technology stocks generally; any restatement of our financial statements or any investigation of us by the SEC, the FDA or another regulatory authority; or a decline, or rise, of stock prices in the capital markets generally. We are subject to work stoppage, transportation, severe weather, natural disasters and related risks. We manufacture products at various locations in the United States and foreign countries and sell our products worldwide. We depend on third party transportation companies to deliver supplies necessary to manufacture our products from vendors to our various facilities and to move our products to customers, operating divisions, and other subsidiaries located worldwide. Our manufacturing operations, and the operations of the transportation companies on which we depend, may be harmed by natural disasters or significant human events, such as a war, civil unrest, terrorist attack, riot, strike, slowdown, or similar events. Any disruption in our manufacturing or transportation could materially harm our ability to meet customer demands or our operations. Furthermore, our manufacturing operations could be affected by many other factors beyond our control, including severe weather conditions and natural disasters, including hurricanes, earthquakes and tornadoes. These conditions could cause substantial damage to our facilities, interrupt our production and disrupt our ability to deliver products to our customers. Fluctuations in our effective tax rate may adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operation. We are subject to taxation in numerous countries, states and other jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate is derived from a combination of applicable tax rates in the various countries, states and other jurisdictions in which we operate. In preparing our financial statements, we estimate the amount of tax that will become payable in each of these jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate may, however, differ from the estimated amount due to numerous factors, including a change in the mix of our profitability from country to country and changes in tax laws. Relevant authorities may also disagree with tax positions we have taken and assess further taxes. On December 22, 2017, the U.S. government enacted comprehensive federal tax legislation commonly referred to as the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 ( TCJA ). The TCJA makes changes to the corporate tax rate, business related deductions and taxation of foreign earnings, among others, that will generally be effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017. These changes could have a material impact on the value of our U.S. deferred tax assets, result in significant 1 time charges in the current or future taxable years and increase our future U.S. tax expense. We continue to evaluate the TCJA and its requirements, as well as its application to our business and its impact on our effective tax rate. At this stage, it is unclear how many U.S. states will incorporate these federal law changes, or portions thereof, into their tax codes. The implementation by us of new practices and processes designed to comply with, and benefit from, the TCJA and its rules and regulations could require us to make substantial changes to our business practices, allocate additional resources, and increase our costs, which could negatively affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. In addition, further changes in the tax laws of foreign jurisdictions could arise, including as a result of recommendations issued by the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development, or the OECD, which could, if implemented, result in substantial changes to numerous long standing tax positions and principles. These contemplated changes, to the extent adopted by OECD members or other countries, could increase tax uncertainty and may adversely affect our provision for income taxes. Any of these factors could cause us to experience an effective tax rate significantly different from previous periods or our current expectations, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operation. 33 Table of Contents Limits on reimbursement imposed by governmental and other programs may adversely affect our business and results of operation. We sell our products to hospitals and other healthcare providers around the world that typically receive reimbursement for the services provided to patients from third party payers such as government programs (e.g., Medicare and Medicaid in the U.S.) and private insurance programs. The ability of our customers to obtain appropriate reimbursement for the cost of our products from governmental and private third party payers is critical to our business. Limits on reimbursement imposed by such programs may adversely affect the ability of hospitals and others to purchase our products, which could adversely affect our business and results of operations. Third party payers, whether foreign or domestic, or governmental or commercial, are developing increasingly sophisticated methods of controlling healthcare costs. In general, a third party payer covers a medical procedure only when the plan administrator is satisfied that the product or procedure is reasonable and necessary to the patient treatment; however, the cost effectiveness of the treatment may also be a condition. In addition, in the United States, no uniform policy of coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products exists among third party payers. Therefore, coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products can differ significantly from payer to payer. In addition, payers continually review new and existing technologies for possible coverage and can, without notice, deny or reverse coverage or alter pre authorization requirements for new or existing products and procedures. We cannot provide assurance that we will be successful in any efforts we may potentially undertake to reverse such non coverage decisions. If we are not successful in reversing non coverage policies, or if third party payers that currently cover or reimburse certain procedures reverse or limit their coverage of such procedures in the future, or if other third party payers issue similar policies, our business could be adversely impacted. Further, we believe that future coverage and reimbursement may be subject to increased restrictions, such as additional preauthorization requirements, both in the United States and in international markets. Third party coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products or any of our products in development for which we may receive regulatory approval may not be available or adequate in either the United States or international markets, which could have an adverse impact on our business. Our failure to comply with applicable environmental laws and regulations could affect our business, operations or financial condition. We manufacture and assemble certain products that require the use of hazardous materials that are subject to various national, federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the protection of the environment, health and safety. While the cost of compliance with such laws and regulations has not had a material adverse effect on our results of operations historically, compliance with future regulations may require additional capital investments. Additionally, because we use hazardous and other regulated materials in our manufacturing processes, we are subject to certain risks of future liabilities, lawsuits and claims resulting from any substances we manufacture, dispose of or release. Any accidental release may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We cannot predict what additional environmental, health and safety legislation or regulations will be enacted or become effective in the future or how existing or future laws or regulations will be administered or interpreted with respect to our operations, capital expenditures, results of operations or competitive position. Compliance with more stringent laws or regulations or adverse changes in the interpretation of existing laws or regulations by government agencies could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition, and could require substantial expenditures. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
